#include <iostream>
#include<string>

using namespace std;

class warmachine{
    public:
    
    void hijackersinfo(){
        int h;
        cout<< "hey chief! which years hijacking you need? \n1910\t1920\t1930\t1940\t1950\t\n\n1960\t1970\t1980\t1990\t2000\t\n\n2010\t2020\t\n\n";
        cin>> h;
        
        switch(h){
            case 1910:
            cout<<" HungaryAustria March–July 1919: Fleeing from the Hungarian Soviet Republic, Franz Nopcsa von Felső-Szilvás seized a plane at gunpoint in Budapest to fly to Vienna";
            break;
            case 1920:
            cout<<"United States May 15, 1928: Harry W. Anderson was hijacked by Clarence Frechette while flying near Detroit. At 2,800 feet, Anderson was attacked by Frechette with a ballpeen hammer. They fought for the controls while flying over the city. The plane crash landed and both were taken to the hospital.\nMexico1929–1930 (unconfirmed): In the Fort Worth Star-Telegram daily newspaper (morning edition) 19 September 1970, J. Howard Doc DeCelles states that he was actually the victim of the first skyjacking in December 1929. He was flying a postal route for the Mexican company Transportes Aereos Transcontinentales, ferrying mail from San Luis Potosí to Torreon and then on to Guadalajara. He was approached by Gen. Saturnino Cedillo, governor of the state of San Luis Potosí and one of the last remaining lieutenants of Pancho Villa. Cedillo was accompanied by several other men. He was told through an interpreter that he had no choice in the matter; he had to fly the group to their chosen destination. He stalled long enough to convey the information to his boss, who told him to cooperate. He had no maps, but was guided by the men as he flew above Mexican mountains. He landed on a road as directed, and was held captive for several hours under armed guard. He eventually was released with a Buenos from Cedillo and his staff. DeCelles kept his flight log, according to the article, but he did not file a report with authorities. He went on to work for the FAA in Fort Worth after his flying career.";
            break;
             case 1930:
           cout<<"Peru February 12, 1931: The first recorded aircraft hijack took place in Arequipa, Peru. Byron Richards, flying a Ford Tri-Motor, was approached on the ground by armed revolutionaries. He refused to fly them anywhere and after a 10-day standoff, Richards was informed that the revolution was successful and he could go in return for flying one group member to Lima.\nBrazil September 25, 1932: the Panair do Brasil Sikorsky S-38 registration P-BDAD, still bearing the titles of Nyrba do Brasil, was seized in the company's hangar by three men, who took a fourth as hostage. None were aviators but they managed to take off in the plane. However, the aircraft crashed in São João de Meriti, killing the four men. Apparently the hijacking was related to the events of the Constitutionalist Revolution in São Paulo, and it is considered to be the first Brazilian plane hijacking ";
            break;
             case 1940:
            cout<<" RomaniaTurkey July 25, 1947: A domestic Romanian flight from Bucharest to Craiova was hijacked by three army officers seeking political asylum from communist Romania. The airplane landed at Çanakkale in Turkey. During the hijacking, the flight mechanic, Mitrofan Bescioti, was shot by lieutenant Aurel Dobre.\n\nBulgariaTurkey June 30, 1948: A domestic flight from Varna to Sofia was hijacked by Anti-Communists. The plane landed in Istanbul. The pilot was killed in the struggle.\n\nApril 9, 1948: Twenty Czechs seized a Czech National Airlines commercial plane at gunpoint and flew it to the United States zone of Germany in a mid-air revolt. The hijackers wanted to flee communism in their homeland. Five of the passengers and one of the flight crew chose to return home to Czechoslovakia.\n\nMacauHong Kong July 16, 1948: Miss Macao, a seaplane, was hijacked in an attempted robbery and then crashed into the Pearl River Delta. The crash killed 25 of the 26 passengers and crew. The lead hijacker, Huang Yu was the only survivor.\n\nGreeceSocialist Federal Republic of Yugoslavia September 13, 1948: A T.A.E. commercial flight from Athens to Thessaloniki was hijacked by six young communists who asked the pilots to fly to Yugoslavia. The airplane landed near Skopje and, after the hijackers departed, the airplane returned to Greece. The 1987 film The Noose is based on this story.\n\n";
            break;
             case 1950:
            cout<<"CzechoslovakiaWest Germany March 24, 1950: Three Douglas DC-3s from Czechoslovakia were simultaneously hijacked by former Czech Royal Air Force pilots seeking asylum in the West. Most of the hijackers were the crew of all three aircraft. All three planes landed at the US Air Force Base at Erding, West Germany. 26 of 85 passengers stayed in West Germany to escape from the Communist regime in Czechoslovakia. This was the first incident of mass hijacking in aviation history.\n\nMyanmar June 5, 1954: A team of KNDO (Karen National Defense Organization) led by Maj Saw Kyaw Aye hijacked a Dakota DC-3 of Union of Burma Airways flew from Rangoon (Yangon) to the Arakan (Rakhine) State capital, Sittwe. There were 14 passengers and four airline staff. A monk, a woman and military officers were among those on board. The plan of hijacking is to use the plane to smuggle weapons for KNDO to fight against the government army. Because of fuel shortage, the plane could not land at their intended location and the plan of smuggling weapons was unsuccessful. But there was a government-owned box of 700,000 kyats (US$450 in today's money), guarded by a military officer, which the hijackers had not known. As the original plan did not work, the hijackers decided to steal the money, hand over control of the plane, and flee.\n\nHungary July 13, 1956: Seven young Hungarian students, armed with nothing more than plastic wrenches, hijacked a small domestic aircraft out of Budapest and landed it at a NATO base in West Germany to escape from behind the Iron Curtain.\n\nBrazilArgentina December 2, 1959: the Panair do Brasil Lockheed L-049/149 Constellation, registration PP-PCR, operating flight 246 en route from Rio de Janeiro – Santos Dumont to Belém, with 44 passengers and crew aboard, was seized and hijacked by officers of the Brazilian Air Force and made to land at Aragarças, Goiás. Their intention was to use the aircraft in a bombing of Government buildings in Rio de Janeiro, thereby starting a revolt against President Juscelino Kubitschek de Oliveira. The revolt faded after 36 hours and the aircraft was commanded to fly to Buenos Aires where the hijackers requested asylum. There were no casualties.\n\n";
            break;
             case 1960:
            cout<<"Australia July 19, 1960: In Australia's first hijacking, a man threatened to blow up Trans Australia Airlines Flight 408, but he was disarmed by a member of the crew and a passenger.\n\nPortugal 1961: Hijackers forced an aircraft to circle Lisbon to drop leaflets against the Estado Novo regime. After that, the 6 hijackers forced the crew to fly them back to Morocco.\n\nUnited StatesCuba May 1, 1961: First U.S. Airline flight hijacked to Cuba. A National Airlines Convair 440 flight from Marathon, Florida to Key West was hijacked by a man carrying a knife and a gun who demanded the flight divert to Havana. The aircraft, piloted by Captain Francis X. Riley, was thought to be lost at sea for several hours before authorities learned it had been hijacked.\n\nUnited StatesCuba July 24, 1961: An Eastern Air Lines airplane, performing Eastern Flight 202, is hijacked during a flight between Miami, Florida and Dallas, Texas. The plane was flown to Cuba, and all occupants were allowed to return to the United States.[26] Among the passengers were world champion boxer Luis Manuel Rodriguez, among with his training staff.\n\nUnited States July 31, 1961: The first attempted 'skyjacking' of an airline on American soil. Said to be 'inspired by numerous airliner hijackings from other countries to Cuba', pipeline worker Bruce Britt, Sr., boarded and attempted to commandeer a Pacific Air Lines flight at the Chico Municipal Airport, in Chico, California, intending to return to his home in Smackover, Arkansas. The attempt failed, but Britt shot two airline employees, blinding one for life.\n\nUnited States August 3, 1961: Leon and Cody Bearden hijacked Continental Airlines Flight 54 traveling from Los Angeles to Houston armed with pistols. The Boeing 707 was to be used as a bargaining chip to gain political asylum with Fidel Castro in Cuba. The ordeal ended in El Paso, Texas during re-fueling when Border Patrol Agent Leonard Gilman, who had volunteered to be a hostage, punched Bearden with such force it shattered Gilman's hand.\n\nArgentinaFalkland Islands September 28, 1966: Argentine nationalists, styling themselves 'Condors', hijacked a plane and forced the pilot to fly to Stanley, Falkland Islands.\n\nIsraelAlgeria July 23, 1968: To date, the only successful El Al hijacking attempt, as three members of Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine (PFLP) hijacked El Al Flight 426 from Rome to Tel Aviv. Diverting to Algiers, the negotiations extended over forty days. Both the hijackers and the hostages went free.\n\nFrance November 8, 1968: An Olympic Airways flight out of Paris was hijacked by two Italian men, who carried a handgun and a grenade. The hijackers forced the crew to hand out pamphlets to the crew. The hijackers claimed to be members of the International Command for Greece. The two men later surrendered after directing the plane back to Paris.\n\nUnited StatesCuba November 24, 1968: Luis Armando Pena Soltren, Jose Rafael Rios Cruz and Miguel Castro coerced the pilot of Pan Am Flight 281 out of New York's John F. Kennedy Airport to divert from a scheduled route to Puerto Rico to Havana, Cuba. Passengers were evacuated from Cuba by a U.S. State Department aircraft. There were no fatalities.\n\nUnited StatesCuba February 3, 1969: Eastern Air Lines flight from Newark to Miami was hijacked by two Cuban nationals who diverted it to Havana, Cuba. The plane landed safely in Havana, and the passengers were allowed to return to the United States unharmed.\n\nAugust 29, 1969: TWA Flight 840 was a Trans World Airlines flight from Leonardo da Vinci International Airport in Rome, Italy to Ben Gurion International Airport in Tel Aviv, Israel, that was hijacked on 29 August 1969. There were no fatalities, although the aircraft was significantly damaged, and two hostages were held for two months.\n\nBrazilCuba October 8, 1969: a Cruzeiro do Sul Sud Aviation SE-210 Caravelle VI R en route from Belém-Val de Cães to Manaus-Ponta Pelada was hijacked by 4 people who demanded to be flown to Cuba. The hijack lasted less than a day and there were no casualties.\n\nUnited StatesRepublic of IrelandItaly October 31, 1969: TWA Flight 85 en route from Los Angeles to San Francisco was hijacked by 19-year-old US Marine Raffaele Minichiello [it]. All passengers, including the band Harper's Bizarre and three stewardesses, were released in Denver. The hijacker, three pilots and a stewardess continued on to JFK airport in New York, where two pilots were added for the overseas flight. The plane refueled in Bangor, Maine and Shannon, Ireland, before continuing to Rome, Italy. In Rome, Minichiello took the chief of the airport police as a hostage and departed in a car, from which he slipped away, but was caught shortly thereafter. Minichiello intended to visit his dying father in Italy. Italy did not extradite Minichiello and he served only 18 months in jail.Covering 6,900 miles, this was the longest hijacking in history. A provisional film deal about the escapade has been signed.\n\nUnited States November 10, 1969: The youngest American on record to attempt to hijack a plane when a Delta Air Lines flight en route from Cincinnati to Chicago was hijacked by 14-year-old David Booth. US Attorney George Kline of Lexington, Kentucky declined to prosecute Booth saying that the federal government did not have facilities to handle prosecution of juveniles.\n\nBrazilCuba November 12, 1969: a Cruzeiro do Sul NAMC YS-11/11A en route from Manaus-Ponta Pelada to Belém-Val de Cães was hijacked by a person who demanded to be flown to Cuba. There were no casualties.\n\nSouth KoreaNorth Korea December 11, 1969: a Korean Air Lines YS-11 en route from Gangneung to Seoul-Gimpo was hijacked by a North Korean agent and flown to North Korea. All four crew members and seven of the 46 other passengers (excluding the agent) were held hostage by North Korea; their fate is still unknown.\n\n";
            break;
             case 1970:
           cout<<"BrazilUruguayCuba January 1, 1970: a Cruzeiro do Sul Sud Aviation SE-210 Caravelle VI R en route from Montevideo to Rio de Janeiro, with 33 occupants aboard, was hijacked by 6 persons who demanded to be flown to Cuba. The flight was diverted to Lima, Panama City and arrived in Havana two days later. There were no casualties.United States March 17, 1970: Eastern Air Lines Shuttle Flight 1320, carrying passengers from Newark to Boston was hijacked around 7:30 P.M. by John J. Divivo who was armed with a .38 caliber revolver. Captain Robert Wilbur Jr., 35, a former Air Force pilot who had only been promoted to captain six months prior, was shot in his arm by the suicidal hijacker. His co-pilot, First Officer James Hartley, 31, was shot without warning by Divivo and collapsed. Divivo then turned the gun on the captain, causing an arm injury. Despite being fatally wounded, Hartley recovered sufficiently to rip the gun from Divivo's hand, and shoot the would-be hijacker three times before lapsing into unconsciousness, and eventually death. Although wounded and slumped between the seats, Divivo arose and began clawing at Captain Wilbur, attempting to force a crash. Wilbur hit Divivo over the head with the gun he had retrieved from the center console. With a .38 slug in his arm and bleeding profusely, he flew his aircraft safely to a landing while talking to the tower, telling them his copilot was shot (but not himself) and needed an ambulance. The pilot landed the plane safely at Logan International Airport, and the hijacker was arrested immediately.On November 1, 1970, Divivo hanged himself while awaiting trial at Charles Street Jail.\n\nJapanSouth KoreaNorth Korea March 31, 1970: Japan Airlines Flight 351, carrying 131 passengers and 7 crew from Tokyo to Fukuoka, was hijacked by Japanese-born North Korean terrorists. 23 passengers were freed at Fukuoka Airport, mainly children and the elderly. 108 passengers and all crew members, along with the terrorists, left Fukuoka, bound for Gimpo Airport, near Seoul. Three days later, the Red Army group asked to be flown to North Korean capital Pyongyang, before leaving from Seoul, 103 passenger and crew hostages were freed, and the terrorists surrendered to North Korean authorities.\n\nBrazilCuba July 1, 1970: a Cruzeiro do Sul Sud Aviation SE-210 Caravelle VI R registration PP-PDX en route from Rio de Janeiro to São Paulo with 31 occupants was hijacked by 4 persons who demanded the release of political prisoners that were to be taken to Cuba. The aircraft was stormed and hijackers arrested. There were no casualties and the hijack lasted less than a day.\n\nBrazilFranceGuyanaTrinidad and TobagoAntigua and BarbudaJamaica July 4, 1970: a Cruzeiro do Sul NAMC YS-11 en route from Belém-Val de Cães to Macapá was hijacked by 1 person and flown to Cayenne, Georgetown, Trinidad and Tobago, Antigua and Jamaica.\n\nUnited StatesCuba August 2, 1970: Pan American World Airways Flight 299 from New York to San Juan was hijacked to Havana with 379 people aboard. This was the first hijacking of a Boeing 747 and the first Boeing 747 to land in Cuba. The captain of the flight was met by Cuban Premier Fidel Castro.\n\nWest GermanySwitzerlandState of Palestine September 6, 1970: As part of the Dawson's Field hijackings by PFLP members, the TWA Flight 741 from Frankfurt (a Boeing 707) and Swissair Flight 100 from Zürich (a Douglas DC-8) were forced to land at Dawson's Field.\n\nIsraelNetherlandsState of Palestine September 6, 1970: As part of the Dawson's Field hijackings by PFLP members, the hijacking of El Al Flight 219 from Amsterdam (a Boeing 707) was foiled: hijacker Patrick Argüello was shot and killed, and his partner Leila Khaled was subdued and turned over to British authorities in London.\n\nState of Palestine September 6, 1970: As part of the Dawson's Field hijackings by PFLP members, two PFLP hijackers who were prevented from boarding the El Al flight, hijacked instead Pan Am Flight 93, a Boeing 747, diverting the large plane first to Beirut and then to Cairo, rather than to the small Jordanian airstrip.\n\nState of Palestine September 9, 1970: As part of the Dawson's Field hijackings by PFLP members, BOAC Flight 775, a Vickers VC10 coming from Bahrain, was hijacked by a PFLP sympathizer and brought to Dawson's Field in order to pressure the British to free Leila Khaled.\n\nSoviet Union October 15, 1970: Aeroflot Flight 244 was hijacked from Batumi, Adjar ASSR, Georgian SSR, to Trabzon, Turkey by a Lithuanian national and his son. An air hostess was killed and some other crew were injured in a shootout. The hijackers later received American citizenship.\n\nUnited StatesJune 4, 1971—Glen Elmo Riggs, 58 years old, a retired coal miner from Ashford, W. Va. hijacked a United Airlines 737 jet and demanded to be flown to Israel. He was captured at Dulles International Airport when the flight engineer, acting on the advice of a psychiatrist in the control tower, talked the hijacker into giving up his pistol. The crew convinced him that the short‐haul, two‐engine 737 was incapable of such a long flight and landed their craft at Dulles—exactly one year after a gunfight ended another attempted hijacking.\n\nIndiaPakistan January 30, 1971: 1971 Indian Airlines hijacking, Indian Airlines Fokker F27 on scheduled Srinagar-Jammu flight is hijacked to Lahore by two self-proclaimed Kashmir Separatists. All passengers were released by February 2 and repatriated to India, but the aircraft was blown-up, leading to an India-Pakistan air-travel ban, and suspension of overflight rights until 1976.\n\nPhilippinesChina March 30, 1971: Philippine Airlines flight was hijacked in March 1971 by six students from the Mindanao State University, opposed to the Marcos government. The plane landed in Guangzhou (Canton) in southern China, and the Chinese authorities let the students stay in the country. The plane was then allowed to fly back to the Philippines. No one was hurt.\n\nRomaniaHungaryAustria May 17, 1971: an IL-14 with 4 staff members and 16 passengers was hijacked by 6 men at the Oradea Airport (Romania), then forced to fly to Budapest (Hungary), then Vienna (Austria). The passengers and the crew were released in Vienna, while the hijackers flew to West Germany.\n\nUnited StatesMexicoPeruBrazilArgentina July 2, 1971: Braniff Flight 14, a Boeing 707 flying from Acapulco to New York with 102 passengers and a crew of eight was hijacked on approach to a refueling stop in San Antonio, Texas. The ordeal lasted 43 hours across Texas, Mexico, Peru, Brazil and ended happily in Argentina. After a refueling stop in Monterrey, the hijackers released flight attendants Jeanette Eatman Crepps, Iris Kay Williams and Anita Bankert Mayer and all of the passengers. The remaining crew of Captain Dale Bessant, Bill Wallace, Phillip Wray and flight attendants Ernestina Garcia and Margaret Susan Harris flew on to Lima. The hijackers, a U.S. Navy deserter named Robert Jackson and his Guatemalan lady friend, demanded and got a ransom of $100,000 and wanted to go to Algeria. The Bessant crew was released, one by one, and replaced by a volunteer crew of Captain Al Schroeder, Bill Mizell, Bob Williams, and Navigator Ken McWhorter. Two Lima based employees, Delia Arizola and Clorinda Ontaneda, volunteered to board the flight. Clorinda had been attending college classes, something she did regularly during her off days from flying. Delia had been retired 6 months but still offered her services. The 707 left for Rio and planned to refuel, but the hijacker forced them on to Buenos Aires. The long flight and fatigue took its toll, and the hijackers gave up. It was a record for long-distance hijacking, over 7,500 miles.\n\nPakistanBangladesh August 20, 1971: A Pakistan Air Force T-33 trainer was hijacked during the Bangladesh Liberation War (before Indo-Pakistani war of 1971) in Karachi when a Bengali instructor pilot, Flight Lieutenant Matiur Rahman, knocked out the young Pilot Officer Rashid Minhas with the intention to join Mukti Bahini in the Bangladesh Liberation War. On regaining consciousness in mid-flight, Rashid Minhas struggled for flight control as well as relaying the news of his hijack to the PAF base. In the end of the ensuing struggle he succeeded in crashing his aircraft into the ground near Thatta after seeing no way to prevent the hijack and the defection. He was posthumously awarded Pakistan's highest military award Nishan-e-Haider (Sign of the Lion) for his act of bravery. For his attempt to defect from the Pakistan Air Force to join Bangladesh Liberation War, Matiur Rahman was decorated with the Bir Sreshtho award by Bangladesh which is their highest honor given.\n\nUnited StatesCuba November 8, 1971: Charles Hill, Ralph Lawernce, and Albert Finney were driving a carload of weapons to Louisiana as part of the Republic of New Afrika militant group. They murdered New Mexico State Police officer Robert Rosenbloom during a traffic stop and escaped to Albuquerque where they hijacked a TWA 727 to Cuba.\n\nCanadaUnited States November 12, 1971: Air Canada Flight 812, a commercial DC-8 aircraft en route from Vancouver to Montreal, was hijacked as it approached Regina, Saskatchewan. The hijacker, Paul Cini, was armed with a shotgun and two bundles of dynamite. He then held the plane hostage for a ransom of CAN $1 million and forced the crew to land in Great Falls, Montana. Stewardess Mary Dohey, who had been attempting to reason with Cini for the duration of the flight, managed to persuade him to release the flight's 118 passengers and some crew members. Shortly after, the remaining crew on board managed to overpower the hijacker, ending the 8 hour ordeal. For her actions during the hijacking, Dohey was presented with the Cross of Valour, Canada's highest civilian decoration for bravery. She was the first living person to receive the honour.\n\nUnited States November 24, 1971: A man who became known as D. B. Cooper hijacked Northwest Orient Airlines Flight 305, a Boeing 727-100 aircraft flying from Portland, OR, to Seattle, WA, received US$200,000 in ransom, and parachuted from the plane. The actual name of the hijacker remains unknown. The hijacker revealed what appeared to be a bomb to a flight attendant and demanded the ransom and parachutes. The flight landed in Seattle, and FBI agents provided the ransom money and parachutes. Cooper then released all passengers and two flight attendants. After refueling, the aircraft took off again and flew toward Reno, NV. Cooper opened the aft stairs and jumped from the plane with a parachute during a heavy rainstorm. The aircraft was forced to land with the aft stairs deployed. The FBI believes Cooper most likely did not survive, but the case remains unsolved.\n\nCanadaCuba December 26, 1971: Patrick Critton hijacked an airplane from Thunder Bay, Ontario to Cuba. He was convicted in 2001.\n\nUnited States January 12, 1972: Braniff Flight 38, a Boeing 727, was hijacked by a lone gunman, Billy Gene Hurst, Jr., as it departed Houston, Texas bound for Dallas, Texas. Hurst allowed the other 94 passengers to deplane after landing at Dallas Love Field but continued to hold the 7 crewmembers hostage, demanding to fly to South America and asking for US$2 million, parachutes, and jungle survival gear, amongst other items. After a 6-hour standoff, a package containing some of the items was delivered by Dallas police, and the hostages escaped while Hurst was examining it. Police stormed the jetliner shortly afterwards and arrested Hurst without serious incident.\n\nUnited States January 28, 1972: TWA Flight 2, Los Angeles to New York, was hijacked by con man and bank robber Garrett Trapnell while over Chicago. Trapnell demanded $306,800 in cash (to recoup the loss of a recent court case), the release of Angela Davis (as well as that of a friend of his who was also imprisoned), and clemency from President Richard Nixon. The FBI retook the aircraft during a crew switch at Kennedy Airport; Trapnell was shot and wounded, no one else was hurt. Trapnell's hijacking came after a string of domestic incidents and resulted in an overhaul of flight procedures by the Nixon Administration, procedures that remained in place until the hijackings on September 11, 2001. Trapnell and unrelated hijacker Martin J. McNally (see June 23, 1972, below) attempted to escape Marion federal prison on May 24, 1978, after Trapnell's girlfriend Barbara Ann Oswald hijacked a helicopter and ordered it to Marion but that hijacking ended when the pilot grabbed the woman's gun and killed Oswald. On December 21, 1978, Oswald's 17-year-old daughter Robin Oswald hijacked TWA Flight 541 in another attempt to rescue Trapnell. She surrendered after 10 hours of negotiations at the airport in Marion.\n\nWest GermanyJapanSouth YemenState of Palestine February 22, 1972: Lufthansa Flight 649, a Boeing 747-200 from Tokyo to Frankfurt, is hijacked by a group commandeered by the Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine (PFLP) during the Delhi-Athens leg and forced to divert to Aden, where all 182 passengers and crew were released on the next day in exchange for a $5 million ransom.\n\nUnited StatesApril 7, 1972: United Airlines Flight 855, from Newark, New Jersey, to Los Angeles, California, carrying 85 passengers and a crew of six, was hijacked by Richard McCoy Jr. during a stopover in Denver, Colorado. This was a copycat hijacking, modelled on the D.B Cooper 1971 hijacking of Northwest Orient Airlines Flight 305, less than 5 months prior. The aircraft was a Boeing 727 with aft stairs (the same equipment used in the D. B. Cooper incident), via which McCoy escaped in mid-flight by parachute after giving the crew similar instructions to what Cooper had done. McCoy obtained a $500,000 cash ransom, but following fingerprint and handwriting matches, McCoy was arrested two days after the hijacking, convicted and sentenced to jail.\n\nUnited StatesHonduras May 5, 1972: Frederick Hahneman hijacked Eastern Air Lines Flight 175 en route from Allentown, Pa, to Miami, Fl. After receiving $303,000, 6 parachutes and two cartons of cigarettes he ordered the pilot to fly to Honduras, his birth country, where he parachuted over the jungle and disappeared. A manhunt by the FBI and Honduran police, plus a $25,000 bounty from the airline eventually led to his surrender.\n\nAustriaIsrael May 8, 1972: Sabena Flight 571\n\nRhodesiaSouth AfricaMalawi May 24, 1972: A South African Airways Boeing 727 was hijacked between Salisbury, Rhodesia and Johannesburg and flown to Blantyre in Malawi. After all the crew and passengers escaped, the Malawian security forces started shooting at the aircraft with the 2 hijackers still on board. The hijackers surrendered.\n\nUnited StatesAlgeria June 3, 1972: Western Airlines Flight 701 from Los Angeles to Seattle was hijacked by Willie Roger Holder, a black Vietnam veteran, and Catherine Marie Kerkow, his white girlfriend. The hijackers claimed they had a bomb in an attaché case and demanded $500,000. After allowing all 97 passengers to get off in San Francisco, they flew to Algeria where they were granted political asylum. The Algerian government confiscated and returned $488,000 of the ransom money to US officials.\n\nUnited States June 23, 1972: In the 9th copycat D.B. Cooper-style hijacking Martin J. McNally under the pseudonym of Robert W. Wilson hijacked American Airlines Flight 119, a Boeing 727 bound from St. Louis to Tulsa and demanded $502,500. The plane flew back and forth between Tulsa and St. Louis while the loot was raised. In St. Louis, live news reports about the hijacking prompted David J. Hanley, a 30-year-old businessman, to crash his 1972 Cadillac at 80 mph through two airport fences, travel down the runway at high speed and crash into the nosegear of the plane, which was beginning to taxi. The demolished car lodged under the fuselage and one wing. Hanley suffered multiple injuries and was charged with willfully damaging a civil aircraft. The hijacker transferred to a new 727 and jumped out of the plane over Indiana. The full loot bag and gun were discovered by searchers near Peru, Indiana. Fingerprints led to McNally. While in Marion Federal Prison McNally and fellow inmate and hijacker Garrett Trapnell (see January 28, 1972 above) were involved in an attempted prison escape on May 24, 1978, after Trapnell's girlfriend hijacked a helicopter. The escape attempt ended when the helicopter pilot grabbed the woman's gun and killed her. McNally was paroled from prison January 27, 2010.\n\nUnited States July 2, 1972: Pan Am Flight 841 was a commercial passenger flight of a Boeing 747 from San Francisco, California to Saigon, South Vietnam which was hijacked over the South China Sea on 2 July 1972, ostensibly as an act of protest concerning US involvement in the Vietnam War as well as the expulsion from the United States of the South Vietnamese hijacker, a recent graduate of a US university. The hijacking ended when the captain and passengers overcame and killed the lone hijacker after the plane landed in Saigon.\n\nUnited States July 5, 1972: Pacific Southwest Airlines Flight 710 was hijacked by two Bulgarian immigrants shortly after take-off from Sacramento, California en route to San Francisco. The hijackers demanded $800,000, two parachutes and to be flown to the Soviet Union. The hijacking ended on the runway in San Francisco when agents from the Federal Bureau of Investigation stormed the plane killing both hijackers and one passenger. Two other passengers were wounded. These were the first passengers killed and wounded in a skyjacking in the United States.\n\nUnited StatesAlgeria July 31, 1972: Delta Air Lines Flight 841 was hijacked by five members of the Black Liberation Army including the elusive George Wright. The flight was originally from Detroit to Miami. The hijackers exchanged the passengers for $1 million in Miami and forced the plane to fly to Boston, then to Algeria, who returned the plane and cash but released the hijackers.\n\nSwedenSpain September 15, 1972: Scandinavian Airlines System Flight 130, a DC 9 – Gunder Viking – with registration number LN-RLO en route from Torslanda, Gothenburg, Sweden, to Stockholm, Sweden, was hijacked five minutes after take off by three armed Croatians connected to Ustasa. The plane was ordered to land at Bulltofta airport, Malmö, Sweden. 86 passengers and 4 crew members were held hostage until the next morning when the hostages were released in exchange for 500,000 Swedish Kronor and seven Croatians imprisoned in Sweden. The last passenger left the plane unharmed after 16 hours. The plane and crew was then ordered to fly to Madrid, Spain, where the hijackers later were to be put on trial.\n\nWest GermanyLebanonSocialist Federal Republic of YugoslaviaLibya October 29, 1972: Lufthansa Flight 615, a Boeing 727, from Beirut to Frankfurt, piloted by capt. Walter Claussen, was hijacked by three men and flown to Zagreb, asking for liberation of the three surviving perpetrators of the Munich Massacre on 5 September that year. After boarding the three liberated men, the plane was redirected to Tripoli in Libya where all hostages were finally released.\n\nUnited StatesCanadaCuba November 10, 1972: Southern Airways Flight 49, was hijacked by three men and flown to multiple locations in the United States, and one Canadian city. At one point, the hijackers threatened to fly the plane into the nuclear reactor at the Oak Ridge National Laboratory, if their demands for $10 million in cash were not met. While stopped for refueling at McCoy Air Force Base, Orlando, the FBI shot out the plane's tires, prompting the hijackers to force pilot William Haas to take off. The hijacking came to an end when the plane landed on a partially foam-covered runway in Havana, Cuba, and the hijackers were captured after attempting to escape.\n\nCanada December 14, 1972: Quebecair Flight 321 en route to Toronto was hijacked by Larry Maxwell Stanford and diverted to Montreal where the hijacker surrendered.\n\nSoviet Union April 24, 1973: The hijacking attempt of Aeroflot Tu-104 flying from Leningrad to Moscow. When a flight attendant tried to disarm the hijacker, the bomb detonated, killing both and causing decompression. The crew made an emergency landing in Leningrad; the plane was written off.\n\nSoviet Union May 18, 1973: Another hijacking attempt of Aeroflot Tu-104 flying from Irkutsk to Chita. The hijacker demanded the plane be diverted to China. The bomb detonated and the plane crashed near Lake Baikal, killing all 82 people on board.\n\nNepal June 10, 1973: 1973 Nepal plane hijack\n\nVenezuelaNetherlands AntillesPanamaMexicoCubaMay 18, 1973: Domestic flight of a two-engine Convair aircraft with 32 passengers to Caracas, Venezuela hijacked between Valera and Barquisimeto. Three male and one female hijackers linked to the leftist group Punto Cero demanded the release of 79 political prisoners from Venezuelan prisons. Diverting the plane via Curacao in the Dutch Antilles and Panama, where three passengers were released, to Mérida, Yucatán and Mexico City, where they issued an ultimatum. Mediation by a Mexican official resulted in continuation of the voyage back to Mérida, where the threat was reduced to blowing up the plane upon arrival in Cuba and release of the hostages. Aircraft continued to Havana, Cuba, where the hijackers and the Mexican negotiator left the aircraft. The aircraft then returned to Maiquetía, Venezuela with the remaining passengers.\n\nColombiaArubaEcuadorPeruArgentinaMay 30, 1973: Colombian airline SAM Colombia HK-1274 with 84 passengers hijacked between Pereira and Medellin. The two male hijackers, wearing a balaclava and with guns, asked for 200.000 dollars and the liberation of political prisoners judged in El Socorro, Colombia. They diverted the plane to Aruba, Central America, Ecuador, Peru and Argentina. Hijackers released all passengers in different stops. Finally the plane landed in Buenos Aires without the hijackers, who previously escaped from the plane. The hijackers were two former Paraguayan football players who disguised as guerrilla in order to get the ransom and without any political affiliation. The hijack lasted for more than 60 hours and it was one of the largest airline hijacking at the time\n\nUnited Arab Emirates July 20, 1973: Japan Airlines Flight 404\n\nFrance} On 18 October 1973, Danielle Cravenne, the second wife of French producer Georges Cravenne, was shot dead by a police sniper at Marignane airport. Danielle, who was mentally unstable, had tried to hijack a Boeing 727 [fr] to protest against the release of the film The Mad Adventures of Rabbi Jacob which was being promoted by Cravenne and which she considered anti-Palestinian, especially in the midst of the Yom Kippur War.\n\nRepublic of Ireland October 31, 1973: The Mountjoy Prison helicopter escape, in which three members of the Provisional Irish Republican Army (IRA) were allowed to escape from Mountjoy Prison in Dublin, Ireland aboard a hijacked light helicopter; prison guards initially presumed the vehicle was carrying government officials.NetherlandsMaltaUnited Arab Emirates November 25, 1973: A KLM Boeing 747, Mississippi, was hijacked by three young Arabs over Iraqi airspace on a scheduled Amsterdam-Tokyo flight with 247 passengers on board. After the hijackers threatened to blow up the plane when no country would grant landing permission, the plane landed in Malta. Most of the passengers and the eight stewardesses were released after negotiations with the Maltese PM Dom Mintoff who argued with the hijackers that the plane could not possibly take off with both the passengers and the 27,000 gallons of fuel they had demanded given the (then) short runway. With 11 passengers on board the jumbo jet left Malta to Dubai where the incident ended without fatalities.\n\nItaly December 17, 1973: 1973 Rome airport attacks and hijacking\n\nUnited States February 22, 1974: At Baltimore/Washington International Airport Samuel Byck shot and killed Maryland Aviation Administration Police Officer George Neal Ramsburg before storming Delta Air Lines Flight 523 to Atlanta. When informed by pilots Reese (Doug) Loftin and Fred Jones they could not take off until wheel blocks were removed, he shot them both and grabbed a nearby passenger, ordering her to fly the plane. Jones died as he was being removed from the aircraft after the event was concluded; Byck was mortally wounded when Charles Troyer, an Anne Arundel County police officer on the jetway, stormed the plane and fired four shots through the aircraft door at Byck with a .357 Magnum revolver taken from the deceased Ramsburg. Two of the shots penetrated the thick window of the aircraft door and wounded Byck. Before the police could gain entry to the aircraft, Byck committed suicide by shooting himself in the head. Byck's motive was to hijack the aircraft and crash it into the White House, in an assassination attempt on President Richard Nixon.\n\nPortugalAustralia September 4, 1975: A group of 44 civilians, including armed supporters of the Timorese Democratic Union (UDT), commandeered a Royal Australian Air Force (RAAF) Caribou, A4-140, on the ground at Baucau Airport in the then Portuguese Timor, which was in the middle of a civil war. The Caribou had landed at Baucau on a humanitarian mission for the International Committee of the Red Cross. The civilians demanded that the RAAF crew members fly them to Darwin Airport (also RAAF Base Darwin) in Australia, which they did. After the Caribou arrived there, the Australian government detained the civilians for a short period, and then granted refugee visas to all of them. The Guardian later described A4-140 as the only RAAF plane ever hijacked, and the incident as one of the more remarkable stories in Australia's military and immigration history.\n\nArgentina October 5, 1975: Aerolíneas Argentinas Flight 706 was hijacked by a Montoneros platoon as part of Operation Primicia. The plane was diverted to Formosa airport, where all of its passengers and crew were released and the hijackers took off with a few FN FAL rifles they had taken during a simultaneous assault on an Argentine Army base. The aircraft landed in a crop field Rafaela, Santa Fe province and the guerrillas made a hasty retreat in cars that had been waiting at the improvised airstrip.\n\nFranceIsraelUgandaState of Palestine June 27, 1976: The hijack of Air France Flight 139 on June 27, 1976, by members of the militant organizations Revolutionary Cells and the Popular Front for the Liberation of Palestine – External Operations was brought to an end on July 4 at Entebbe Airport, Uganda by Operation Entebbe: Israeli commandos assaulted the building holding the hijackers and hostages, killing all Palestinian hijackers and rescuing 105 persons, almost all Israeli and Jewish hostages. However, three passengers and one commando were killed.\n\nUnited StatesCanadaIcelandFrance September 10, 1976: TWA Flight 355 was hijacked by Croatian separatists. Some passengers were allowed to deplane in Canada before the hijackers continued on to Iceland, then France, where they released the remaining passengers and surrendered to authorities. One New York police officer was killed while working on a bomb which the hijackers had planted at Grand Central Station.\n\nIndiaPakistan September 10, 1976: Indian Airlines plane Boeing 737 was hijacked from Palam Airport Delhi by a group of six militants from Jammu and Kashmir: Syed Abdul Hameed Dewani, Syed M Rafique, M Ahsan Rathore, Abdul Rashid Malik, Ghulam Rasool and Khawaja Ghulam Nabi Itoo. To refuel the plane, they took permission from CAA Lahore Airport in Pakistan to land and refuel. The hijackers were caught in a trick during breakfast, being served colourless tranquilliser with water. All six hijackers were taken in custody and the plane was sent back to India with 83 passengers on board. The militants were later released in Pakistan citing lack of evidence.\n\nSoviet UnionFinland July 10, 1977: Two gunmen hijack a domestic Soviet flight with the intention of flying to Sweden, but are forced to land in Finland due to lack of fuel. They would eventually surrender and be extradited back to the Soviet Union.\n\nBangladeshJapan September 28, 1977: Japan Airlines Flight 472 was being hijacked by the Japanese Red Army (JRA). The JRA hijacked the plane over India and forced it to land in Dhaka, Bangladesh. The Japanese Government freed six imprisoned members of the group and allegedly paid a $6M ransom.\n\nSpainWest GermanyState of PalestineSomalia October 13, 1977: Lufthansa Flight 181 (also known as the Landshut) was hijacked by Palestinian hijackers on a flight from Palma de Mallorca to Frankfurt. The ordeal ended in Mogadishu, Somalia when GSG 9 commandos stormed the plane. Three hijackers were killed and 86 hostages were freed. The pilot was killed before the raid. The hand of West Germany's Red Army Faction was suspected.\n\nMalaysiaJapan December 4, 1977: Suspected lone member of Japanese Red Army hijacked Malaysian Airline System Flight 653. The Boeing 737 then crashed after he shot both pilots and himself. All 100 people on board died.\n\nUnited States March 13, 1978: United Flight 696 was hijacked by Clay Thomas immediately after takeoff out of San Francisco International Airport. The aircraft landed in Oakland and the release of cabin crew and passengers was negotiated by the flight crew. The fueling was cut short by the hijacker and Flt 696 took off only partially refueled. Flight 696 landed in Denver to take on more fuel for Cuba. While waiting for the fuel, the cockpit crew jumped from the cockpit to escape the hijacker. The hijacker surrendered to the FBI within minutes of the crew's escape. No fatalities but the three cockpit crew-members suffered fractures and torn cartilage from the two-story leap.\n\nUnited States August 25, 1978: TWA Flight 830 was hijacked by an unknown hijacker, who hid among the passengers. The hijacker delivered detailed instructions to the pilot, but all passengers (including the daughter of a US Ambassador) along with the crew managed to simply disembark at their destination without incident.\n\nPolandEast GermanyWest Germany August 30, 1978: LOT Polish Airlines Flight 165 was hijacked by two East Germans in order to escape to West Berlin. There were no casualties, the hijackers surrendered and were tried by never-before-convened United States Court for Berlin.\n\nFinland September 30, 1978: Finnair Flight 405[101] was hijacked by Aarno Lamminparras; the flight was en route from Oulu to Helsinki. He requested a ransom of 675,000 markkas, which he received, and as a result he released all 44 passengers on board. Then he ordered the plane to fly him to Amsterdam in the Netherlands and then back to Oulu. He returned home and was arrested there the next day. He served seven years and one month in prison and now lives in Sweden.One of the passengers on board the hijacked plane was singer Monica Aspelund.\n\nIndia December 20, 1978: Bholanath Pandey and Devendranath Pandey hijacked Indian Airlines flight IC-410. They demanded the immediate release of Indian National Congress party leader Indira Gandhi who was imprisoned at that time on the charges of fraud and misconduct. Later, they were awarded with party tickets for this act by the Indira Gandhi government in 1980 such that Devendra Nath Pandey rose to become a minister in the government of the most populous state of India, Uttar Pradesh. This case was also mentioned by Jarnail Singh Bhindranwale to justify his claim regarding the hypocrisy of the Indian government.\n\nUnited States December 21, 1978: 17-year-old Robin Oswald hijacked TWA Flight 541 flying from Louisville to Kansas City claiming she had three sticks of dynamite. The plane landed at Williamson County Regional Airport where she hoped to seek the release of Garrett Trapnell who was serving time at Marion Federal Penitentiary. Trapnell was serving time for a January 28, 1972 hijacking (see January 28, 1972 above). On May 24, 1978 her mother Barbara Ann Oswald was killed after hijacking a helicopter in an attempt to rescue Trapnell. Robin eventually surrendered at the Williamson Airport. The dynamite was revealed to be flares.\n\nAustralia April 4, 1979: Domico Speranza, an Italian national, attempted to hijack a Boeing 747SP operating Pan American World Airways Flight 815, taking a young woman hostage and boarding the emptied aircraft at a gate of Sydney Airport's international terminal. Police rescued the hostage but initially failed to subdue Speranza. Hours later, police stormed the aircraft and shot him in the shoulder and forehead. Speranza died at the hospital later that evening from his injuries.\n\nJune 12, 1979 A Delta Air Lines wide‐bodied jetliner carrying 207 passengers and crew members on a flight from New York to Fort Lauderdale, Fla., was diverted to Cuba by a hijacker.\n\nUnited StatesRepublic of Ireland June 20, 1979: Nikola Kavaja, a Serbian nationalist and anti-communist hijacked American Airlines Flight 293. During the hijacking, Kavaja demanded and received another airplane with the intent of crashing it into the headquarters of the Yugoslav Communist Party. His lawyer convinced him to surrender after landing at Shannon Airport, Ireland.\n\n ";
            break;
             case 1980:
           cout<<" United States July 11, 1980: Glenn Kurt Tripp, 17, of Arlington, Wash., was convicted of extortion and kidnapping in a July 11, 1980, hijack attempt of a Northwest plane at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport. He was sentenced to 20 years probation.\n\nPakistanAfghanistan March 2, 1981: Pakistan International Airlines's flight PK-326 began as a routine domestic trip from Karachi to Peshawar. In midair, three heavily armed men seized the plane, diverted it to Kabul, Afghanistan, and demanded the release of 92 political prisoners from the Pakistani jails. On March 7, twenty nine hostages including women, children, and sick men were released in Kabul. The Boeing 720B stayed in Kabul for a week, and when Pakistan's President Mohammad Zia-ul-Haq refused to give in, the hijackers shot a Pakistani diplomat Tariq Rahim in full view of the other passengers and dumped his body onto the tarmac.[109]IndonesiaMalaysiaThailand March 28, 1981: The Hijacking of Flight Garuda Indonesia Flight 206. This was the first serious Indonesian airline hijacking, since the first case was a desperate Marine hijacker who was killed by the pilot himself. The hijackers, a group called Commando Jihad, hijacked the DC 9 Woyla, en route from Palembang to Medan, and ordered the pilot to fly the plane to Colombo, Sri Lanka. But since the plane did not have enough fuel, it refueled in Penang, Malaysia and then to Don Muang, Thailand. The hijackers demanded the release of Commando Jihad members imprisoned in Indonesia, and US$1.5 million, as well as a plane to take those prisoners to an unspecified destination. The Kopassus commandos who took part in this mission trained for only three days with totally unfamiliar weapons, executed this fast-paced operation. One of the Kopassus commandos was shot by the hijacker leader, who then shot himself. All the other hijackers were killed. All the hostages were saved.[citation needed]Republic of IrelandFrance May 2, 1981: Aer Lingus Flight 164 from Dublin to London was hijacked and diverted to Le Touquet in France by a man demanding that the Pope release the third secret of Fatima. While authorities negotiated with the hijacker by radio in the cockpit, French special forces entered the rear of the aircraft and overpowered him.IndiaPakistan September 29, 1981: Indian Airlines Flight 423, a Boeing 737 operating a domestic flight from Delhi to Amritsar in India, was hijacked by Sikh extremists and forced to land in Lahore, Pakistan, where special forces stormed the aircraft; there are no fatalities.[110]IndiaSeychellesSouth Africa November 26, 1981: Air India Flight 224 from Salisbury, Rhodesia to Bombay was hijacked at Mahe Airport Seychelles by mercenaries while on a re-fuelling stop. The mercenaries were fleeing an abortive coup. The B707-300 (registration VT-DVB) was forced to fly to Durban. After freeing the 78 passengers and crew, the mercenaries surrendered.\n\nKuwait February 25, 1982: Kuwait Airways Flight KU561 from Kuwait to Beirut to Libya (return flight to Libya) was hijacked on the ground in Beirut, Lebanon on the return from Libya, with 150 aboard by Hamza akl Hamieh shortly after landing, demanding news and release of Imam Musa al-Sadr, founder of the Islamic group AMAL, who had disappeared in Libya in 1978. It was the second longest hijacking in history, covering 6,000 miles. The hijackers threatened to kill passengers if demands were not met and Lebanese security forces did not withdraw from the area around the plane. Despite negotiations with a high level Shia cleric Sheikh Abdul Amir Qabalan it was the missing Imams sister, Rehab, who persuaded Hamza to abandon the aircraft. Sheikh Qabala promised that appeals would be launched at the UN, The Arab League and the World Court to find Imam Sadr. In all five of his previous hijackings, Hamza never faced trial or incarceration. Just after midnight they left the plane and disappeared into the night. Captain Les Bradley flew the damaged plane back to Kuwait. There were no casualties. \n\nSri LankaThailandItaly July 1, 1982: A Sri Lankan, identified as Sepala Ekanayake, who was 33 years old, hijacked an Alitalia jumbo jet from Bangkok, Thailand, in order to be united with his wife and child and to return to Sri Lanka.\n\nIndia August 4, 1982: An Indian Airlines flight from Delhi to Amritsar was hijacked en-route by a Sikh militant with the help of a fake bomb. The hijacked plane landed at Amritsar (after being denied permission to land in Lahore, Pakistan). A police officer (sent in the disguise of a pilot) and some passengers overpowered the hijacker when his attention was diverted.\n\nIndia August 20, 1982: A lone Sikh militant, armed with a pistol and a hand grenade, hijacked an Indian Airlines on a scheduled flight from Jodhpur to New Delhi carrying 69 persons. Indian security forces killed the hijacker and rescued all passengers. Peter Lamont, production designer working on the James Bond film Octopussy, was a passenger.\n\nUnited States January 20, 1983: Glenn Kurt Tripp, 20, of Arlington, Wash., said he had a bomb in a shoebox tried to hijack a jetliner to Afghanistan, and was shot by one of two Federal Bureau of Investigation agents who sneaked aboard when the plane landed at Portland. At 4:30 P.M., three hours after Northwest Flight 608 arrived from Seattle with six crew members and 35 passengers, F.B.I. agents climbed into the cockpit of the plane on a remote runway of Portland International Airport. All 41 people aboard escaped unhurt and no bomb was found. Tripp had previously been convicted of extortion and kidnapping for an earlier July 11, 1980, hijack attempt at Seattle-Tacoma International Airport.\n\nUnited StatesMexico February 16, 1983: An Iranian man, Hussein Shey Kholya, hijacked a Rio Airways Dash 7 flight Killeen, TX ILE- Dallas, TX DFW. The plane landed in Nuevo Laredo, Mexico\n\nSoviet Union November 18, 1983: Tbilisi hijacking incident.\n\nBulgaria March 7, 1983: A Balkan Bulgarian Airlines An-24 is hijacked shortly after taking off at 18:00 local time for a regular flight from Sofia to Varna. Four men, aged from 17 to 22 (Lachezar Ivanov, Krasen Gechev, Ivaylo Vladimirov and Valentin Ivanov), produce knives and take the 40 passengers and crew hostage. They present themselves to the passengers as recently escaped recidivist criminals and threaten they will decompress the plane if an attempt is made to disarm them or impede the takeover. The hijackers proceed to threaten the stewardess and demand the plane is diverted to Vienna. A passenger is sent to the cockpit to communicate their demands to the pilot, who in turn relays them to local authorities and receives orders to simulate compliance, while actually maintaining a course to Varna. Meanwhile, authorities cut off all electrical power to Varna, in order to prevent the hijackers from recognizing the Black Sea coast. After landing at the Varna airport, a Bulgarian police officer and an airport worker, speaking fluent German are disguised as Austrian airport staff as they attempt to convince the hijackers they are in Vienna and lure them out of the plane. The hijackers look for a translator to negotiate their surrender, until one of them notices the disguised police officer is wearing a Bulgarian made leather jacket, which leads them to panic and threaten to start executing hostages. At this point the crew manages to let four commandos board the plane through a hatch in the luggage compartment, the commandos storm the plane, disarm and arrest three of the hijackers. The only remaining hijacker, distressed, has locked himself in the airplane bathroom and is threatening to kill the stewardess. Two more commandos enter the plane through the passenger hatch, kick in the bathroom door and shoot Ivanov as he attempts to kill his hostage. Ivanov is the only victim of the incident. The stewardess, having sustained a wound in her neck and bleeding heavily, was quickly transported to a nearby hospital and made a full recovery.\n\nFranceAustriaSwitzerlandItalySyriaIran August 27, 1983: Armed with guns and grenades, hijackers seized an Air France Boeing 727 aircraft after departure from Vienna, Austria. They forced it to land in Geneva, then Sicily and Damascus – over which period 93 of the 111 passengers and crew were released – before arriving in Tehran. The hijackers demanded the release of Lebanese prisoners in French prisons and the withdrawal of French troops from Lebanon. After three days of negotiations in Tehran, the hijackers surrendered and all remaining passengers were released unharmed.\n\nBrazilCuba February 3, 1984: a Cruzeiro do Sul Airbus A300B4-203 flight 302 en route from São Luís to Belém-Val de Cães with 176 passengers and crew aboard was hijacked by 3 persons who demanded to be taken to Cuba. The flight reached Camagüey in less than a day. There were no victims.\n\nIndiaPakistan July 5, 1984: Indian Airlines Flight 405, nine Sikhs belonging to the Khalistan movement forced an Airbus A300 on a domestic flight from Srinagar to Delhi with 254 passengers and 10 crew on board, to be flown to Lahore Airport in Pakistan. The demands of the hijackers (release of prisoners and money) were not met and they ultimately surrendered to Pakistani authorities on July 6.\n\nWest GermanySwitzerlandLebanonIran August 1, 1984: an Air France Boeing 737-200 en route from Frankfurt to Paris with 82 passengers and crew aboard was hijacked by 3 hijackers who demanded to be taken to Tehran.[120] They were Arab protesters against military cooperation between France and Iraq on the Iran–Iraq War context. One steward escaped to the hijacker in Larnaca. The hijacking duration was 48 hours.[121] The hijackers destroyed the aircraft with explosives in front of the TV cameras. There were no victims.Strangely, the hijackers were taken in a big black limousine and disappeared in Iran.\n\nIndiaUnited Arab Emirates August 24, 1984: Seven young Sikh hijackers demanded Indian Airlines Flight 421 flying from Delhi to Srinagar be flown to the United Arab Emirates. The plane was taken to UAE where the defense minister of UAE negotiated the release of the passengers. It was related to the Sikh secessionist struggle in the Indian state of Punjab.\n\nSaudi ArabiaIran November 6, 1984: Two Yemeni hijackers boarded Saudi Airlines flight 040 during a stopover in Jeddah, Saudi Arabia. The flight was travelling from London to Riyadh. One of the Yemenis stormed the cockpit and demanded the flight crew divert to Tehran. Despite reports from the time that Iranian security forces stormed the plane to free the 117 passengers and 14 crew members, in reality a Saudi doctor on board broke into the fire ax box and the pilots overtook the hijacker, pinning him to the floor in first class. The doctor hit the hijacker with the ax under each ear while flight attendants opened the doors and inflated the emergency slides to evacuate the passengers.\n\nLebanonKuwait December 3, 1984: Kuwait Airways Flight 221 Lebanese Shi'a hijackers divert a Kuwait Airways flight to Tehran. Two American USAID officials are shot dead and dumped on the tarmac. The plane is taken by Iranian security forces who were dressed as custodial staff.\n\nLebanonUnited States June 14, 1985: Lebanese Shi'a Amal hijackers divert TWA Flight 847 from Athens to Beirut with 153 people on board. The stand-off ends after Israel frees 31 Lebanese prisoners. Among the passengers was famous Greek singer Demis Roussos. US Navy diver Robert Stethem is tortured and murdered.\n\nState of PalestineEgyptMalta November 23, 1985: Three Palestinian members of the Abu Nidal Organization hijacked its Athens to Cairo route, EgyptAir Flight 648 and fly it to Malta. All together, 60 people died, most of them when Egyptian commandos stormed the aircraft.\n\nSoviet UnionChina December 19, 1985: Yakutsk United Air Group Flight 101/435 was hijacked by the co-pilot and diverted to China. The hijacker was apprehended by the Chinese upon landing, while the passengers returned safely to the Soviet Union.\n\nTaiwanChina May 3, 1986: The Taiwanese pilot of China Airlines Flight 334 subdued his two crew mates on board the cargo flight to Bangkok, Thailand and flew the plane to Guangzhou, mainland China where he defected. The incident triggered the isolationist ROC government to reopen cross-strait negotiations and eventually scrap its Three Noes policy.\n\nIndiaPakistanUnited States September 5, 1986: 22 people are killed when Pakistani security forces storm Boeing 747-121 Pan Am Flight 73 at Karachi, carrying 360 passengers and crew after a 16-hour siege. The flight was en route to Frankfurt from Mumbai, India when the flight was hijacked on the ground in Karachi. On 19 February 2016, Bollywood movie Neerja was released on this hijacking.\n\nSaudi ArabiaIraq December 25, 1986: 63 people are killed when Iraqi Airways Flight 163 crashes near Arar, Saudi Arabia due to an explosion in the cockpit. The plane was hijacked by 3 men of the Lebanese group Islamic Jihad.\n\nUnited States January 11, 1987: A Continental Airlines DC-9 was hijacked in flight by Norwood Emanuel on Jan. 11, 1987. Captain Mark Meyer was credited with thwarting the hijacking by quickly landing at Dulles International outside of Washington D.C.. Capt. Meyer then confronted and distracted Emanuel in the rear of the cabin allowing all 49 passengers and crew to successfully evacuate onto the ramp. Capt. Meyer escaped 2 hours later. The FBI eventually talked Emanuel off of the aircraft. There were no deaths or injuries.\n\nNew ZealandFiji May 19, 1987: Air New Zealand Flight 24. An aircraft refueller at Nadi International Airport, Fiji, attempted to hijack an Air New Zealand Boeing 747-200 stopping at Nadi en route from Tokyo to Auckland. The hijacker entered the cockpit and held the captain, first officer and flight engineer hostage, demanding that the Timoci Bavadra-led government be restored after they were ousted in a military coup d'état six days earlier. After six hours, the hijacker got distracted and the flight engineer knocked him out with a bottle of whisky. None of the 105 passengers or 24 crew (including the three hostages) on board were injured.\n\nNetherlandsItaly December 24, 1987: KLM Flight 343 was hijacked by 15 year old Zino Scioni who said he had a bomb which he said he could control with his wrist watch. He forced the plane to land at Rome and demanded $1 million ransom and a plane to take him to Kuwait then Chad and finally the United States. At 9 pm the hijacker released about 60 passengers. At 11 pm the hijacker was captured by tricking him to get into a car which he thought would take him to the plane and the rest of the hostages were released.\n\nSoviet Union March 8, 1988: Aeroflot Flight 3739. Ovechkin family (a mother and 10 of her children) attempted to hijack a Tu 154 flight from Irkutsk to Leningrad while trying to escape from the USSR. The plane landed on a military airfield near Vyborg and was then stormed. A stewardess and three passengers were killed. The mother was killed by one of her sons by her own request, then four of them committed suicide.\n\nKuwait April 5, 1988: Kuwait Airways Flight 422 was hijacked from Bangkok to Kuwait with 111 passengers and crew aboard, including three members of the Kuwaiti Royal Family. 6 – 7 Lebanese men[131] (including Hassan Izz-Al-Din, a veteran of the TWA 847 hijacking[132]) armed with guns and hand grenades forced the pilot to land in Mashhad, Iran and demanded the release of 17 Shiite Muslims guerrillas held in Kuwait. Lasting 16 days and traveling 3,200-miles from Mashhad in northeastern Iran to Larnaca, Cyprus, and finally to Algiers, it is the longest skyjacking to date. Two passengers, Abdullah Khalidi, 25, and Khalid Ayoub Bandar, 20, both Kuwaitis, were shot dead by the hijackers and dumped on the tarmac in Cyprus.[133] Kuwait did not release the 17 prisoners and the hijackers were allowed to leave Algiers.\n\nBrazil September 29, 1988: a man hijacked a VASP Boeing 737-300 registration PP-SNT operating flight 375 en route from Belo Horizonte-Pampulha to Rio de Janeiro. He wanted to force a crash on the Palácio do Planalto, the official presidential workplace in Brasília. The pilot convinced the hijacker to divert to Goiânia where an emergency landing was made. The hijack ended with 1 victim.\n\nSoviet Union December 1, 1988: 1988 Ordzhonikidze bus hijacking\n\nCzechoslovakiaWest Germany March 29, 1989: Two teenagers from Czechoslovakia armed with grenades and shotguns hijack Malév Hungarian Airlines Flight 640 at Prague Ruzyně Airport, and fly the Tupolev Tu-154B with 15 hostages to Frankfurt Airport before surrendering.\n\n";
            break;
             case 1990:
            cout<<" United KingdomKuwait August 1, 1990: British Airways Flight 149 landed in Kuwait the same day that Iraq under Saddam Hussein invaded the country. The Iraqi Army seized the plane and held the passengers hostage. All but one of the hostages were released at the war's end, while the plane was destroyed.\n\nSoviet UnionPakistan August 19, 1990: Hijackers seized a plane [ru] which used for transportation of prisoners.\n\nChina October 2, 1990: A hijacker seized a plane from China which later crashed as it tried to land in Guangzhou, killing 128 people.\n\nSingaporeMalaysia March 26, 1991: Singapore Airlines Flight 117 was hijacked en route from Subang Airport to Singapore Changi Airport by 4 individuals claiming to be members of the Pakistan Peoples Party. Elite Singapore Special Operations Force members stormed the plane on 27 March, killing all four hijackers and freeing all 114 passengers and 11 crew in an operation lasting just 30 seconds. None of the passengers and crew were injured.\n\nRussiaTurkey November 9, 1991: Shamil Basaev seized a plane from Mineralnye Vody Airport and landed in Turkey in sign of protest of August Coup and State Committee on the State of Emergency.\n\nIndia January 22, 1993: Indian Airlines Flight 810 en-route from Lucknow Airport to the Delhi-Indira Gandhi International Airport was hijacked by a Hindu activist and returned to Lucknow. The hijacker demanded the release of all Hindu karsevaks arrested after the Demolition of the Babri Masjid and for a temple be built at Ram Janmabhoomi where the mosque once stood. The hijacker surrendered to officials after negotiations and the bomb he carried was found be phony.\n\nGermanyEthiopiaUnited States February 11, 1993: Lufthansa Flight 592 scheduled service from Frankfurt to Cairo and Addis Ababa, was hijacked at gunpoint by Nebiu Demeke, an Ethiopian man. The A310 initially flew to Hannover for fuel before flying to New York's JFK where the hijacker surrendered after brief negotiations. No passengers or crew were injured or killed.\n\nIndia March 27, 1993: Indian Airlines Fight 439 was hijacked en-route from Delhi to Madras by a hijacker claiming to be strapped with explosives. He forced the plane to land in Amritsar (after being denied landing permission in Lahore) and demanded political asylum in Pakistan. The hijacker subsequently surrendered and the explosive was found to be a disguised hair-dryer.\n\nIndia April 10, 1993: An Indian Airlines Boeing 737-2A8, en-route from Lucknow to Delhi, was hijacked by four students of the Government Arts College, Lucknow claiming to be strapped with explosives. They demanded changes to the college's courses, cancellation of an award to a professor and postponement of exams. The hijackers were overpowered by passengers on return to the Lucknow Airport and subsequently arrested by the police. They were found to be only carrying a small knife.\n\nIndia April 24, 1993: Indian Airlines Flight 427, a domestic passenger flight between Srinagar and Delhi, was hijacked by a Hizbul Mujahideen militant. Commandos from the Indian National Security Guard rescued all 141 hostages of the Indian Airlines Boeing 737, on the ground at Amritsar airport. The lone hijacker, Mohammed Yousuf Shah, was killed within 5 minutes of commandos entering the plane, before he could react and harm any of the hostages. The rescue was code-named Operation Ashwamedh.\n\nRussiaNorway September 15, 1993: Russian Aeroflot passenger jet flying from Perm to Moscow diverted to Gardermoen airport by two Iranian brothers. Hijackers surrendered and hostages went free. The hijackers were later given asylum in Norway for humanitarian reasons.\n\nNigeriaGermanyNiger October 25, 1993: Nigerian Airways airbus A310 the plane flying from Lagos to Abuja, Nigeria was hijacked by four young men; Richard Ogunderu, Kabir Adenuga, Benneth Oluwadaisi and Kenny Rasaq-Lawal members of Movement for the Advancement of Democracy. The flight was diverted to Niamey in Niger although the initial plan was to land the hijacked plane in Germany however, low fuel in the Jet necessitated a landing in Niamey. On landing, the hijackers found hundreds of armed gendarmes at the airport, but before then they had distributed their demands among the passengers, calling on the Nigerian government to overturn the annulment of the June 12 election and swear in Moshood Abiola, the acclaimed winner of the election. They gave the government 72 hours to meet their demands or else they would set the plane ablaze. However, they allowed 34 passengers to go and held onto the remaining 159 among whom were top Nigerian government officials. The four held on to the plane for some days, trailed by bait negotiations until the gendarmes stormed the plane to rescue the remaining passengers.\n\nUnited States April 7, 1994: FedEx Flight 705 experienced an attempted hijack by disgruntled employee Auburn Calloway as it left Memphis, Tennessee, with the intention of crashing it after being fired the previous day. He was subdued by the flight crew before an emergency landing back at Memphis.\n\nAlgeriaFrance December 24, 1994: Air France Flight 8969 was hijacked from Algiers by four GIA hijackers planning to crash into the Eiffel Tower in central Paris. After the murder of 3 passengers, GIGN commandos stormed the plane in Marseilles, killing all hijackers and freeing all remaining passengers.\n\nAlbaniaAfghanistan August 3, 1995: Airstan incident: Russian cargo jet flying from Tirana to Kabul was forced to land in Kandahar by Taliban forces. Jet's crew had been held in a captivity until escape in 1996.\n\nIranIsrael September 20, 1995: Iranian defector and flight attendant Rida Garari hijacked Kish Air flight 707, which landed in Israel. No casualties.\n\nLebanonBulgariaNorway September 3, 1996: Hemus Air Tu-154 aircraft was hijacked by the Palestinian Nadir Abdallah, flying from Beirut to Varna. The hijacker demanded that the aircraft be refuelled and given passage to Oslo, Norway after landing at Varna Airport. All of the 150 passengers were freed at Varna, afterwards the crew continued the flight to Oslo, where the hijacker surrendered and asked for political asylum.\n\nEthiopiaKenyaComoros November 23, 1996: Ethiopian Airlines Flight 961 crashed into the Indian Ocean near a beach in the Comoros Islands after hijackers refused to allow the pilot to land and refuel the plane. 125 passengers died and the remaining 50 passengers survived with minor injuries. This was the third incident in which there were survivors of a passenger jet that had been intentionally ditched into a body of water.\n\nMaltaTurkeyGermany June 9, 1997: Two Turkish men hijacked Air Malta Flight 830 en route from Malta to Turkey on June 9, 1997 surrendered to police at an airport in Cologne, Germany, early on the same day and freed without incident about 80 crew members and passengers on board.\n\nPakistan May 25, 1998: Four men hijacked PIA Flight 544 en route from Gwadar to Turbat. The hijackers were arrested without casualties.\n\nColombia 12 April 1999: A Fokker 50 operating Avianca Flight 9463 from Bogotá to Bucaramanga was hijacked by 6 ELN members, who forced the plane to make an emergency landing on a clandestine runway in the Bolivar region. A few of the about 40 passengers were released quickly, others were occasionally released when private ransom monies were paid. A negotiator- a celebrity comedian- was assassinated. Many hostages were held for more than a year, and one passenger died during captivity, (heart attack). The last hostage was not released until 19 months after the hijacking, on 22 November 2000.[144][145] Passenger Leszli Kálli wrote a book about her experience based on her diaries; tedium was her biggest complaint.\n\nJapan July 23, 1999: All Nippon Airways Flight 61 was hijacked by a lone man. He killed the pilot before being subdued.\n\nNepalIndiaPakistanUnited Arab EmiratesAfghanistan December 24, 1999: Pakistan-based hijackers hijacked Indian Airlines Flight 814 en route from Kathmandu and diverted it to Amritsar, Lahore, Dubai, and finally Kandahar. After a week-long stand-off India agreed to release three jailed terrorists in exchange for the hostages. One hostage was stabbed to death and his body thrown on the tarmac as a warning attack.\n\n";
            break;
             case 2000:
           cout<<"AfghanistanUzbekistanKazakhstanRussiaUnited Kingdom February 6, 2000: Ariana Afghan Airlines Boeing 727 was hijacked on an internal flight within Taliban-controlled Afghanistan, and ended up at London Stansted Airport, where most of the passengers claimed political asylum.\n\nPhilippines May 25, 2000: Philippine Airlines Flight 812 was hijacked en route from Davao City, Philippines to Manila. The hijacker parachuted from the aircraft while still airborne; his body was later found.\n\nBrazil August 18, 2000: A VASP Boeing 737-2A1 registration PP-SMG en route from Foz do Iguaçu to Curitiba-Afonso Pena was hijacked by 5 persons with the purpose of robbing BRL 5 million (approximately US$2.75 million) that the aircraft was transporting. The pilot was forced to land at Porecatu where the hijackers fled with the money. There were no victims.\n\nSaudi ArabiaIraqUnited Kingdom October 14, 2000: Saudi Arabian Airlines Flight 115,[149] flying from Jeddah to London was hijacked en route by two men who claimed they were armed with explosives. The hijackers commandeered the Boeing 777-200 to Baghdad, Iraq, where all 90 passengers and 15 crew members were safely released. The two hijackers, identified as Lieutenant Faisal Naji Hamoud Al-Bilawi and First Lieutenant Ayesh Ali Hussein Al-Fareedi,[150] both Saudi citizens, were arrested and later extradited to Saudi Arabia in 2003.\n\nRussiaIsrael November 11, 2000: A Vnukovo Airlines Tu-154 flying from Makhachkala to Moscow was hijacked by a man demanding it be diverted to Israel. The plane landed at an Israeli military base where the hijacker surrendered. None of 59 people on board were injured.\n\nYemenDjiboutiIraq January 23, 2001: Yemenia Flight 448 was hijacked by a man armed with a pen gun who demanded to be taken to Baghdad, Iraq. In addition to his gun, he claimed to have explosives hidden in his suitcase. The flight crew convinced the hijacker to divert to Djibouti to refuel, where they overpowered him. He was extradited to Yemen, and sentenced to 15 years in prison.\n\nRussiaTurkeySaudi ArabiaIslamic Emirate of Afghanistan March 15, 2001: Another Vnukovo Airlines Tu-154 flying from Istanbul to Moscow was hijacked by three Chechens demanding it be diverted to Saudi Arabia. After the plane with 174 people on board landed at Medina the hijacker threatened to blow it up unless it would be refuelled for flying to Afghanistan. The Saudi authorities stormed the plane. During the assault, Saudi police killed two people: one of the passengers (Turkish citizen), and the leader of the hijackers. The stewardess, Yulia Fomina, was killed during the hijacking, and later the plane was named after her.\n\nUnited Airlines Flight 93 wreckage at the crash site in Somerset County, Pennsylvania on September 11, 2001\n\nUnited States September 11, 2001: American Airlines Flight 11, United Airlines Flight 175, American Airlines Flight 77, and United Airlines Flight 93 were hijacked on the morning of September 11 by Al-Qaeda-affiliated extremists and used as suicide weapons. Flight 11 and 175 were deliberately crashed into the Twin Towers of the World Trade Center, Flight 77 was crashed into the Pentagon, and Flight 93 crashed into a field in Pennsylvania after hijackers crashed the plane due to a revolt by passengers. Both towers of the World Trade Center collapsed, and the Pentagon was severely damaged along its western façade; in total 2,996 people, including the 19 hijackers, were killed and over 6,000 people were injured. The suicide attacks led to the War on Terror.Australia May 29, 2003: 10 minutes after take off, a man attempted to hijack Qantas Flight 1737 that was on flight from Melbourne Airport to Launceston Airport. With two sharpened wooden stakes from his pocket, he was overpowered by the flight purser and other passengers.AlbaniaTurkeyItaly October 3, 2006: Turkish Airlines Flight 1476, flying from Tirana to Istanbul, was hijacked by Hakan Ekinci in Greek airspace. The aircraft, with 107 passengers and six crew on board, transmitted two coded hijack signals which were picked up by the Greek air force; the flight was intercepted by military aircraft and landed safely at Brindisi, Italy.\n\nSudanChad January 24, 2007: an Air West Boeing 737 was hijacked over Sudan, but landed safely at N'Djamena, Chad.\n\nMauritaniaSpainFrance February 15, 2007: an Air Mauritanie Boeing 737 flying from Nouakchott to Las Palmas with 87 passengers on board was hijacked by a man who wanted to fly to Paris, but the plane landed in an air base near Las Palmas and the hijacker, a Moroccan, was arrested.\n\nCyprusTurkey August 18, 2007: an Atlasjet MD-80 en route from Nicosia to Istanbul was hijacked by two Arab students, who said they were Al Qaeda operatives, one trained in Afghanistan, and wanted to go to Tehran, Iran. The plane landed in Antalya, the passengers escaped and the hijackers were arrested.\n\nSudanFranceEgyptLibyaAugust 26, 2007: a Sun Air Boeing 737 flying from Nyala, Darfur, in Western Sudan to the Sudanese capital, Khartoum, was hijacked shortly after takeoff.[citation needed] The hijackers demanded to be taken to France where they reputedly wanted to gain asylum. The plane initially tried to land at Cairo but was refused permission. It subsequently touched down at Kufra, Libya. The hijackers gave themselves up almost 24 hours after taking the plane. There were no reported casualties.\n\nNew ZealandAustralia February 8, 2008: Eagle Airways Flight 2279 a British Aerospace Jetstream 32EP ZK-ECN flying from Blenheim to Christchurch was hijacked shortly after takeoff. The hijacker demanded the flight be diverted to Australia. She stabbed both pilots and a passenger before the plane safely landed at Christchurch Airport. She alleged there were two explosives on board, but after an inspection by NZ Police nothing was found.\n\nJamaicaCanadaCuba April 19, 2009: CanJet Flight 918, a Boeing 737-800 preparing to depart from the Sangster International Airport in Montego Bay, Jamaica to Canada was hijacked by a gunman who forced his way through airport security onto the plane. His main motive was a demand to the crew to fly him to Cuba. Most of the passengers on the plane gave him money to buy their freedom. For the rest of the night, negotiations took place as 6 crew members were held hostage in the flight for several hours. Quick responses from the police force allowed them to disarm the hijacker and arrest him. There were no casualties.\n\nMexico September 9, 2009: AeroMéxico Flight 576, a Boeing 737-800 flying from Cancún to Mexico City was hijacked by José Marc Flores Pereira, a Bolivian citizen claiming he had a bomb and demanding to speak to Mexican president Felipe Calderón. The plane landed at Mexico City International Airport where it then taxied to a remote stand where the passengers and crew were later released. Mexican officials stormed the plane where 5 men were taken into custody with only 1 being held. There were no casualties. It was the first hijacking for the airline\n\n ";
            break;
             case 2010:
           cout<<"NorwayTurkey January 5, 2011: Turkish Airlines Flight 1754, flying from Oslo to Istanbul, was in Bulgarian airspace when an unsuccessful attempt was made to hijack it. The suspect allegedly said that he had a bomb and that he would blow up the aircraft unless the plane returned to Norway. Some passengers overpowered the hijacker and the flight safely landed at Atatürk International Airport at 9:30 p.m after the pilot notified emergency service. All 60 passengers and seven crew got off the aircraft; none were injured during the incident. The suspect was arrested.\nFranceItalyLibyaApril 24, 2011: an attempt was made to hijack Alitalia Flight 329, en route from Charles de Gaulle Airport, Paris, France to Fiumicino Airport, Rome and divert it to Tripoli International Airport, Libya. The hijacker, reported to be an advisor to the Kazakhstan delegation to UNESCO, was subdued by cabin crew and other passengers. He was arrested and taken into custody after the aircraft made a safe landing at Rome.\n June 29, 2012: an attempt was made to hijack Tianjin Airlines Flight GS7554 from Hotan to Ürümqi. Six people tried to hijack the aircraft 10 minutes after take-off. There were 6 police officers on board. Four were in plain clothes, taking the plane for a business trip. The hijackers used aluminium canes with sharpened tips to attack the members of the crew. The police officers and civilians on board subdued the hijackers, all of whom were of Uyghur ethnicity. The plot was foiled and the plane returned to Hotan in 22 minutes after takeoff.\nUkraineTurkeyRussia February 7, 2014: Pegasus Airlines Flight 751, during the start of the 2014 Winter Olympics, a man attempted to hijack Pegasus Airlines Flight 751 that was on a flight from Kharkiv, Ukraine, to Istanbul, Turkey, saying he had a bomb on board, and demanding to be flown to Sochi, the host city of the 2014 Winter Olympics. The pilots turned off the inflight monitors and landed at Istanbul's Sabiha Gökçen Airport, fooling the man into thinking he was landing in Sochi. The plane, a Boeing 737-800, was escorted to Istanbul by two Turkish F-16 fighter jets. The man, who appeared to be severely intoxicated, was detained by police and taken to the Istanbul Security Headquarters.\nEthiopiaItalySwitzerland February 17, 2014: Ethiopian Airlines Flight 702, a scheduled flight from Addis Ababa to Rome was hijacked by the unarmed co-pilot, who had locked the pilot out of the cockpit, then flew to Geneva airport. According to the airline,[160] the Boeing 767-300 (ET-AMF) was flying north over Sudan when it changed its transponder to indicate a hijacking. The aircraft circled Geneva's airport several times, before landing around 6:00am with one engine and less than 10 minutes of fuel remaining. The co-pilot surrendered to police after the plane landed.\nEgyptCyprus March 29, 2016: Flight MS181, an Egyptair Airbus A320 carrying 81 passengers from Alexandria to Cairo, was taken over after a passenger said he was wearing an explosives belt and was diverted to Larnaca International Airport.[163][164] The hijacker surrendered after hours of negotiations and no casualties were reported.\nLibyaMalta December 23, 2016: Flight 209, an Afriqiyah Airways Airbus A320 carrying 118 passengers from Sebha, Libya to Tripoli, was diverted to Malta International Airport with two men on board claiming to carry a hand grenade.[166] The hijackers tried to blow the aircraft up, but eventually surrendered to authorities with no incident or loss of life.\nChina Apr 15, 2018: an airplane of Air China, Flight CA1350, was hijacked and diverted to Zhengzhou Xinzheng International Airport.[167]BangladeshUnited Arab EmiratesFeb 24, 2019: Biman Bangladesh Airlines Flight 147 was hijacked by a 26-year-old male passenger during the first leg of a flight from Dhaka, Bangladesh, to Chittagong and Dubai. The hijacker was shot and killed by the Bangladesh Army Para-Commando Brigade.\n ";
            break;
             case 2020:
            cout<<"GreeceLithuaniaBelarus May 23, 2021: Ryanair Flight 4978 was forcibly diverted to Minsk International Airport while flying over Belarus en route from Athens to Vilnius, after local authorities falsely claimed a bomb was on board and State Security Committee of the Republic of Belarus (KGB) officers initiated a fight with the flight crew.[169] The flight was diverted in order to detain Roman Protasevich, a journalist and activist considered a terrorist by the KGB.\n[170]United States July 7, 2021: A male passenger grabbed the flight controls of a Ryan Air Services Cessna 208 Caravan on approach to Aniak Airport after a scheduled flight from Bethel Airport in Alaska carrying a single pilot and four other passengers. The man briefly placed the aircraft in a nosedive at low altitude before being pushed away by the pilot and restrained by other passengers. The pilot regained control and landed the aircraft safely; no injuries were reported. The man was arrested by Alaska State Troopers and admitted that his actions were an attempted murder-suicide. He was charged with several counts of assault, attempted assault, and making terroristic threats, and may face federal charges.\n ";
            break;
            
        }
    }
     
      void hackersinfo(){
        int k;
        cout<< "hey chief! which years hacking you need? \n1900's\t\t2000's\n\n";
        cin>> k;
        
        switch(k){
            case 1900:
            
           cout<<"1903\n\nMagician and inventor Nevil Maskelyne disrupts John Ambrose Fleming's public demonstration of Guglielmo Marconi's purportedly secure wireless telegraphy technology, sending insulting Morse code messages through the auditorium's projector.\n\n1930s\n\n1932\n\nPolish cryptologists Marian Rejewski, Henryk Zygalski and Jerzy Różycki broke the Enigma machine code.\n\n1939\n\nAlan Turing, Gordon Welchman and Harold Keen worked together to develop the Bombe (on the basis of Rejewski's works on Bomba). The Enigma machine's use of a reliably small key space makes it vulnerable to brute force.\n\n1940s\n\n1943\n\nRené Carmille, comptroller general of the Vichy French Army, hacked the punched card system used by the Nazis to locate Jews.\n\n1949\n\nThe theory that underlies computer viruses was first made public in 1949, when computer pioneer John von Neumann presented a paper titled Theory and Organization of Complicated Automata. In the paper von Neumann speculated that computer programs could reproduce themselves.\n\n1950s\n\n1955\n\nAt MIT, hack first came to mean fussing with machines. The minutes of an April 1955 meeting of the Tech Model Railroad Club state that Mr. Eccles requests that anyone working or hacking on the electrical system turn the power off to avoid fuse blowing.\n\n1957\n\nJoe Joybubbles Engressia, a blind seven-year-old boy with perfect pitch, discovered that whistling the fourth E above middle C (a frequency of 2600 Hz) would interfere with AT&T's automated telephone systems, thereby inadvertently opening the door for phreaking.\n\n1960s\n\nVarious phreaking boxes are used to interact with automated telephone systems.\n\n1963\n\nThe first ever reference to malicious hacking is 'telephone hackers' in MIT's student newspaper, The Tech of hackers tying up the lines with Harvard, configuring the PDP-1 to make free calls, war dialing and accumulating large phone bills.\n\n1965\n\nWilliam D. Mathews from MIT found a vulnerability in a CTSS running on an IBM 7094. The standard text editor on the system was designed to be used by one user at a time, working in one directory, and so created a temporary file with a constant name for all instantiations of the editor. The flaw was discovered when two system programmers were editing at the same time and the temporary files for the message-of-the day and the password file became swapped, causing the contents of the system CTSS password file to display to any user logging into the system.\n\n1967\n\nThe first known incidence of network penetration hacking took place when members of a computer club at a suburban Chicago area high school were provided access to IBM's APL network. In the Fall of 1967, IBM (through Science Research Associates) approached Evanston Township High School with the offer of four 2741 Selectric teletypewriter based terminals with dial-up modem connectivity to an experimental computer system which implemented an early version of the APL programming language. The APL network system was structured in Workspaces which were assigned to various clients using the system. Working independently, the students quickly learned the language and the system. They were free to explore the system, often using existing code available in public Workspaces as models for their own creations. Eventually, curiosity drove the students to explore the system's wider context. This first informal network penetration effort was later acknowledged as helping harden the security of one of the first publicly accessible networks:\n\nScience Research Associates undertook to write a full APL system for the IBM 1500. They modeled their system after APL/360, which had by that time been developed and seen substantial use inside of IBM, using code borrowed from MAT/1500 where possible. In their documentation they acknowledge their gratitude to a number of high school students for their compulsion to bomb the system. This was an early example of a kind of sportive, but very effective, debugging that was often repeated in the evolution of APL systems.\n\n1970s\n\n1971\n\nJohn T. Draper (later nicknamed Captain Crunch), his friend Joe Engressia (also known as Joybubbles), and blue box phone phreaking hit the news with an Esquire magazine feature story.\n\n1979\n\nKevin Mitnick breaks into his first major computer system, the Ark, the computer system Digital Equipment Corporation (DEC) used for developing their RSTS/E operating system software.\n\n1980s\n\nvte\n\nHacking in the 1980s\n\n1980\n\nThe FBI investigates a breach of security at National CSS (NCSS). The New York Times, reporting on the incident in 1981, describes hackers as[16]\n\ntechnical experts; skilled, often young, computer programmers, who almost whimsically probe the defenses of a computer system, searching out the limits and the possibilities of the machine. Despite their seemingly subversive role, hackers are a recognized asset in the computer industry, often highly prized\n\nThe newspaper describes white hat activities as part of a mischievous but perversely positive 'hacker' tradition. When a National CSS employee revealed the existence of his password cracker, which he had used on customer accounts, the company chastised him not for writing the software but for not disclosing it sooner. The letter of reprimand stated that The Company realizes the benefit to NCSS and in fact encourages the efforts of employees to identify security weaknesses to the VP, the directory, and other sensitive software in files\n\n1981\n\nChaos Computer Club forms in Germany.\n\nIan Murphy aka Captain Zap, was the first cracker to be tried and convicted as a felon. Murphy broke into AT&T's computers in 1981 and changed the internal clocks that metered billing rates. People were getting late-night discount rates when they called at midday. Of course, the bargain-seekers who waited until midnight to call long distance were hit with high bills.\n\n1983\n\nThe 414s break into 60 computer systems at institutions ranging from the Los Alamos National Laboratory to Manhattan's Memorial Sloan-Kettering Cancer Center.[18] The incident appeared as the cover story of Newsweek with the title Beware: Hackers at play.[19] As a result, the U.S. House of Representatives held hearings on computer security and passed several laws.\n\nThe group KILOBAUD is formed in February, kicking off a series of other hacker groups which form soon after.\n\nThe movie WarGames introduces the wider public to the phenomenon of hacking and creates a degree of mass paranoia of hackers and their supposed abilities to bring the world to a screeching halt by launching nuclear ICBMs.\n\nThe U.S. House of Representatives begins hearings on computer security hacking.\n\nIn his Turing Award lecture, Ken Thompson mentions hacking and describes a security exploit that he calls a Trojan horse.\n\n1984\n\nSomeone calling himself Lex Luthor founds the Legion of Doom. Named after a Saturday morning cartoon, the LOD had the reputation of attracting the best of the best—until one of the most talented members called Phiber Optik feuded with Legion of Doomer Erik Bloodaxe and got 'tossed out of the clubhouse'. Phiber's friends formed a rival group, the Masters of Deception.\n\nThe Comprehensive Crime Control Act gives the Secret Service jurisdiction over computer fraud.\n\nCult of the Dead Cow forms in Lubbock, Texas, and begins publishing its ezine.\n\nhe hacker magazine 2600 begins regular publication, right when TAP was putting out its final issue. The editor of 2600, Emmanuel Goldstein(whose real name is Eric Corley), takes his handle from the leader of the resistance in George Orwell's 1984. The publication provides tips for would-be hackers and phone phreaks, as well as commentary on the hacker issues of the day. Today, copies of 2600 are sold at most large retail bookstores.\n\nThe Chaos Communication Congress, the annual European hacker conference organized by the Chaos Computer Club, is held in Hamburg, Germany.\n\nWilliam Gibson's groundbreaking science fiction novel Neuromancer, about Case, a futuristic computer hacker, is published. Considered the first major cyberpunk novel, it brought into hacker jargon such terms as cyberspace, the matrix, simstim, and ICE.\n\n1985\n\nKILOBAUD is re-organized into The P.H.I.R.M. and begins sysopping hundreds of BBSs throughout the United States, Canada, and Europe.\n\nThe online 'zine Phrack is established.\n\nThe Hacker's Handbook is published in the UK.\n\nThe FBI, Secret Service, Middlesex County NJ Prosecutor's Office and various local law enforcement agencies execute seven search warrants concurrently across New Jersey on July 12, 1985, seizing equipment from BBS operators and users alike for complicity in computer theft,[24] under a newly passed, and yet untested criminal statute.[25] This is famously known as the Private Sector Bust,[26] or the 2600 BBS Seizure,[27] and implicated the Private Sector BBS sysop, Store Manager (also a BBS sysop), Beowulf, Red Barchetta, The Vampire, the NJ Hack Shack BBS sysop, and the Treasure Chest BBS sysop.\n\n1986\n\nAfter more and more break-ins to government and corporate computers, Congress passes the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act, which makes it a crime to break into computer systems. The law, however, does not cover juveniles.[citation needed]\n\nRobert Schifreen and Stephen Gold are convicted of accessing the Telecom Gold account belonging to the Duke of Edinburgh under the Forgery and Counterfeiting Act 1981 in the United Kingdom, the first conviction for illegally accessing a computer system. On appeal, the conviction is overturned as hacking is not within the legal definition of forgery.\n\nArrest of a hacker who calls himself The Mentor. He published a now-famous treatise shortly after his arrest that came to be known as the Hacker Manifesto in the e-zine Phrack. This still serves as the most famous piece of hacker literature and is frequently used to illustrate the mindset of hackers.\n\nAstronomer Clifford Stoll plays a pivotal role in tracking down hacker Markus Hess, events later covered in Stoll's 1990 book The Cuckoo's Egg.\n\n1987\n\nThe Christmas Tree EXEC worm causes major disruption to the VNET, BITNET and EARN networks.\n\n1988\n\nThe Morris Worm. Graduate student Robert T. Morris, Jr. of Cornell University launches a worm on the government's ARPAnet (precursor to the Internet).[31][32] The worm spreads to 6,000 networked computers, clogging government and university systems. Robert Morris is dismissed from Cornell, sentenced to three years' probation, and fined $10,000.\n\nFirst National Bank of Chicago is the victim of $70 million computer theft.\n\nThe Computer Emergency Response Team (CERT) is created by DARPA to address network security.\n\nThe Father Christmas (computer worm) spreads over DECnet networks.\n\n1989\n\nJude Milhon (aka St Jude) and R. U. Sirius launch MONDO 2000, a major '90s tech-lifestyle magazine, in Berkeley, California.\n\nThe politically motivated WANK worm spreads over DECnet.\n\nDutch magazine Hack-Tic begins.\n\nThe Cuckoo's Egg by Clifford Stoll is published.\n\nThe detection of AIDS (Trojan horse) is the first instance of a ransomware detection.\n\n1990s\n\nvte\n\nHacking in the 1990s\n\n1990\n\nOperation Sundevil introduced. After a prolonged sting investigation, Secret Service agents swoop down on organizers and prominent members of BBSs in 14 U.S. cities including the Legion of Doom, conducting early-morning raids and arrests. The arrests involve and are aimed at cracking down on credit-card theft and telephone and wire fraud. The result is a breakdown in the hacking community, with members informing on each other in exchange for immunity. The offices of Steve Jackson Games are also raided, and the role-playing sourcebook GURPS Cyberpunk is confiscated, possibly because the government fears it is a handbook for computer crime. Legal battles arise that prompt the formation of the Electronic Frontier Foundation, including the trial of Knight Lightning.\n\nAustralian federal police tracking Realm members Phoenix, Electron and Nom are the first in the world to use a remote data intercept to gain evidence for a computer crime prosecution.\n\nThe Computer Misuse Act 1990 is passed in the United Kingdom, criminalising any unauthorised access to computer systems.\n\n1992\n\nRelease of the movie Sneakers, in which security experts are blackmailed into stealing a universal decoder for encryption systems.\n\nOne of the first ISPs, MindVox, opens to the public.\n\nBulgarian virus writer Dark Avenger wrote 1260, the first known use of polymorphic code, used to circumvent the type of pattern recognition used by antivirus software, and nowadays also intrusion detection systems.[citation needed]\n\nPublication of a hacking instruction manual for penetrating TRW credit reporting agency by Infinite Possibilities Society (IPS) gets Dr. Ripco, the sysop of Ripco BBS mentioned in the IPS manual, arrested by the United States Secret Service.\n\n1993\n\nThe first DEF CON hacking conference takes place in Las Vegas. The conference is meant to be a one-time party to say good-bye to BBSs (now replaced by the Web), but the gathering was so popular it became an annual event.\n\nAOL gives its users access to Usenet, precipitating Eternal September.\n\n1994\n\nSummer: Russian crackers siphon $10 million from Citibank and transfer the money to bank accounts around the world. Vladimir Levin, the 30-year-old ringleader, used his work laptop after hours to transfer the funds to accounts in Finland and Israel. Levin stands trial in the United States and is sentenced to three years in prison. Authorities recover all but $400,000 of the stolen money.\n\nHackers adapt to emergence of the World Wide Web quickly, moving all their how-to information and hacking programs from the old BBSs to new hacker web sites.\n\nAOHell is released, a freeware application that allows a burgeoning community of unskilled script kiddies to wreak havoc on America Online. For days, hundreds of thousands of AOL users find their mailboxes flooded with multi-megabyte email bombs and their chat rooms disrupted with spam messages.\n\nDecember 27: After experiencing an IP spoofing attack by Kevin Mitnick, computer security expert Tsutomu Shimomura started to receive prank calls that popularized the phrase My kung fu is stronger than yours.\n\n1995\n\nThe movies The Net and Hackers are released.\n\nThe Canadian ISP dlcwest.com is hacked and website replaced with a graphic and the caption You've been hacked MOFO\n\nFebruary 22: The FBI raids the Phone Masters.\n\n1996\n\nHackers alter Web sites of the United States Department of Justice (August), the CIA (October), and the U.S. Air Force (December).\n\nCanadian hacker group, Brotherhood, breaks into the Canadian Broadcasting Corporation.\n\nArizona hacker, John Sabo A.K.A FizzleB/Peanut, was arrested for hacking Canadian ISP dlcwest.com claiming the company was defrauding customers through over billing.\n\nThe US general accounting office reports that hackers attempted to break into Defense Department computer files some 250,000 times in 1995 alone with a success rate of about 65% and doubling annually.\n\nCryptovirology is born with the invention of the cryptoviral extortion protocol that would later form the basis of modern ransomware.\n\n1997\n\nA 16-year-old Croatian youth penetrates computers at a U.S. Air Force base in Guam.\n\nJune: Eligible Receiver 97 tests the American government's readiness against cyberattacks\n\nDecember: Information Security publishes first issue.[clarification needed]\n\nFirst high-profile attacks on Microsoft's Windows NT operating system\n\n1998\n\nJanuary: Yahoo! notifies Internet users that anyone visiting its site in the past month might have downloaded a logic bomb and worm planted by hackers claiming a logic bomb will go off if computer hacker Kevin Mitnick is not released from prison.\n\nFebruary: The Internet Software Consortium proposes the use of DNSSEC (Domain Name System Security Extensions) to secure DNS servers.\n\nMay 19: The seven members of the hacker think tank known as L0pht testify in front of the US congressional Government Affairs committee on Weak Computer Security in Government.\n\nJune: Information Security publishes its first annual Industry Survey, finding that nearly three-quarters of organizations suffered a security incident in the previous year.[clarification needed]\n\nSeptember: Electronic Disturbance Theater, an online political performance-art group, attacks the websites of The Pentagon, Mexican president Ernesto Zedillo, and the Frankfurt Stock Exchange, calling it conceptual art and claiming it to be a protest against the suppression of the Zapatista Army of National Liberation in southern Mexico. EDT uses the FloodNet software to bombard its opponents with access requests.\n\nOctober: U.S. Attorney General Janet Reno announces National Infrastructure Protection Center.\n\n1999\n\nSoftware security goes mainstream In the wake of Microsoft's Windows 98 release, 1999 becomes a banner year for security (and hacking). Hundreds of advisories and patches are released in response to newfound (and widely publicized) bugs in Windows and other commercial software products. A host of security software vendors release anti-hacking products for use on home computers.\n\nU.S. President Bill Clinton announces a $1.46 billion initiative to improve government computer security. The plan would establish a network of intrusion detection monitors for certain federal agencies and encourage the private sector to do the same.\n\nJanuary 7: The Legion of the Underground (LoU) declares war against the governments of Iraq and the People's Republic of China. An international coalition of hackers (including Cult of the Dead Cow, 2600's staff, Phrack's staff, L0pht, and the Chaos Computer Club) issued a joint statement (CRD 990107 - Hackers on planet earth against infowar) condemning the LoU's declaration of war. The LoU responded by withdrawing its declaration.\n\nMarch: The Melissa worm is released and quickly becomes the most costly malware outbreak to date.\n\nJuly: Cult of the Dead Cow releases Back Orifice 2000 at DEF CON.\n\nAugust: Kevin Mitnick, sentenced to 5 years, of which over 4 years had already been spent pre-trial including 8 months' solitary confinement.\n\nSeptember: Level Seven Crew hacks the U.S. Embassy in China's website and places racist, anti-government slogans on embassy site in regards to 1998 U.S. embassy bombings.\n\nSeptember 16: The United States Department of Justice sentences thePhone Masters.\n\nOctober: American Express introduces the Blue smart card, the industry's first chip-based credit card in the US.\n\nNovember 17: A hacker interviewed by Hilly Rose during the radio show Coast to Coast AM (then hosted by Art Bell) exposes a plot by al-Qaeda to derail Amtrak trains. This results in all trains being forcibly stopped over Y2K as a safety measure. \n\n";      
           break;
           
           case 2000:
           
           cout<<"2000\n\nMay: The ILOVEYOU worm, also known as VBS/Loveletter and Love Bug worm, is a computer worm written in VBScript. It infected millions of computers worldwide within a few hours of its release. It is considered to be one of the most damaging worms ever. It originated in the Philippines; made by an AMA Computer College student Onel de Guzman for his thesis.\n\nSeptember: Computer hacker Jonathan James became the first juvenile to serve jail time for hacking.\n\n2001\n\nMicrosoft becomes the prominent victim of a new type of hack that attacks the domain name server. In these denial-of-service attacks, the DNS paths that take users to Microsoft's websites are corrupted.\n\nFebruary: A Dutch cracker releases the Anna Kournikova virus, initiating a wave of viruses that tempts users to open the infected attachment by promising a sexy picture of the Russian tennis star.\n\nApril: FBI agents trick two Russian crackers into coming to the U.S. and revealing how they were hacking U.S. banks.\n\nJuly: Russian programmer Dmitry Sklyarov is arrested at the annual DEF CON hacker convention. He was the first person criminally charged with violating the Digital Millennium Copyright Act (DMCA).\n\nAugust: Code Red worm, infects tens of thousands of machines.\n\nThe National Cyber Security Alliance (NCSA) is established in response to the September 11 attacks on the World Trade Center.\n\n2002\n\nJanuary: Bill Gates decrees that Microsoft will secure its products and services, and kicks off a massive internal training and quality control campaign.\n\nMarch: Gary McKinnon is arrested following unauthorized access to US military and NASA computers.\n\nMay: Klez.H, a variant of the worm discovered in November 2001, becomes the biggest malware outbreak in terms of machines infected, but causes little monetary damage.\n\nJune: The Bush administration files a bill to create the Department of Homeland Security, which, among other things, will be responsible for protecting the nation's critical IT infrastructure.\n\nAugust: Researcher Chris Paget publishes a paper describing shatter attacks, detailing how Windows' unauthenticated messaging system can be used to take over a machine. The paper raises questions about how securable Windows could ever be. It is however largely derided as irrelevant as the vulnerabilities it described are caused by vulnerable applications (placing windows on the desktop with inappropriate privileges) rather than an inherent flaw within the Operating System.\n\nOctober: The International Information Systems Security Certification Consortium—(ISC)²—confers its 10,000th CISSP certification.\n\n2003\n\nThe hacktivist group Anonymous was formed.\n\nMarch: Cult of the Dead Cow and Hacktivismo are given permission by the United States Department of Commerce to export software utilizing strong encryption.\n\n2004\n\nMarch: New Zealand's Government (National Party) website defaced by hacktivist group BlackMask\n\nJuly: North Korea claims to have trained 500 hackers who successfully crack South Korean, Japanese, and their allies' computer systems.\n\nOctober: National Cyber Security Awareness Month was launched by the National Cyber Security Alliance and U.S. Department of Homeland Security.\n\n2005\n\nApril 2: Rafael Núñez (aka RaFa), a notorious member of the hacking group World of Hell, is arrested following his arrival at Miami International Airport for breaking into the Defense Information Systems Agency computer system in June 2001.\n\nSeptember 13: Cameron Lacroix is sentenced to 11 months for gaining access to T-Mobile's network and exploiting Paris Hilton's Sidekick.\n\nNovember 3: Jeanson James Ancheta, whom prosecutors say was a member of the Botmaster Underground, a group of script kiddies mostly noted for their excessive use of bot attacks and propagating vast amounts of spam, was taken into custody after being lured to FBI offices in Los Angeles.\n\n2006\n\nJanuary: One of the few worms to take after the old form of malware, destruction of data rather than the accumulation of zombie networks to launch attacks from, is discovered. It had various names, including Kama Sutra (used by most media reports), Black Worm, Mywife, Blackmal, Nyxem version D, Kapser, KillAV, Grew and CME-24. The worm would spread through e-mail client address books, and would search for documents and fill them with garbage, instead of deleting them to confuse the user. It would also hit a web page counter when it took control, allowing the programmer who created it as well as the world to track the progress of the worm. It would replace documents with random garbage on the third of every month. It was hyped by the media but actually affected relatively few computers, and was not a real threat for most users.\n\nMay: Jeanson James Ancheta receives a 57-month prison sentence,[57] and is ordered to pay damages amounting to $15,000 to the Naval Air Warfare Center in China Lake and the Defense Information Systems Agency, for damage done due to DDoS attacks and hacking. Ancheta also had to forfeit his gains to the government, which include $60,000 in cash, a BMW, and computer equipment.\n\nMay: The largest defacement in Web History as of that time is performed by the Turkish hacker iSKORPiTX who successfully hacked 21,549 websites in one shot.[citation needed]\n\nJuly: Robert Moore and Edwin Pena were the first people to be charged by U.S. authorities for VoIP hacking. Robert Moore served 2 years in federal prison and was given $152,000 restitution. Once Edwin Pena was caught after fleeing the country, evading authorities for almost 2 years, he was sentenced to 10 years and given $1 million restitution.\n\nSeptember: Viodentia releases FairUse4WM tool which would remove DRM information off Windows Media Audio (WMA) files downloaded from music services such as Yahoo! Unlimited, Napster, Rhapsody Music and Urge.\n\n2007\n\nMay 17: Estonia recovers from massive denial-of-service attack\n\nJune 13: FBI Operation Bot Roast finds over 1 million botnet victims\n\nJune 21: A spear phishing incident at the Office of the Secretary of Defense steals sensitive U.S. defense information, leading to significant changes in identity and message-source verification at OSD.[61][62]August 11: United Nations website hacked by Indian Hacker Pankaj Kumar Singh.\n\nNovember 14: Panda Burning Incense which is known by several other names, including Fujacks and Radoppan.T lead to the arrest of eight people in China. Panda Burning Incense was a parasitic virus that infected executable files on a PC. When infected, the icon of the executable file changes to an image of a panda holding three sticks of incense. The arrests were the first for virus writing in China.[64]2008\n\nJanuary 17: Project Chanology; Anonymous attacks Scientology website servers around the world. Private documents are stolen from Scientology computers and distributed over the Internet.March 7: Around 20 Chinese hackers claim to have gained access to the world's most sensitive sites, including the Pentagon. They operated from an apartment on a Chinese Island.[65]March 14: Trend Micro website successfully hacked by Turkish hacker Janizary (aka Utku).\n\n2009\n\nApril 4: Conficker worm infiltrated millions of PCs worldwide including many government-level top-security computer networks.\n\n2010s\n\nvte\n\nHacking in the 2010s\n\n2010\n\nJanuary 12: Operation Aurora Google publicly reveals[68] that it has been on the receiving end of a highly sophisticated and targeted attack on our corporate infrastructure originating from China that resulted in the theft of intellectual property from Google\n\nJune: Stuxnet The Stuxnet worm is found by VirusBlokAda. Stuxnet was unusual in that while it spread via Windows computers, its payload targeted just one specific model and type of SCADA systems. It slowly became clear that it was a cyber attack on Iran's nuclear facilities—with most experts believing that Israel[69] was behind it—perhaps with US help.\n\nDecember 3: The first Malware Conference, MALCON took place in India. Founded by Rajshekhar Murthy, malware coders are invited to showcase their skills at this annual event supported by the Government of India. An advanced malware for Symbian OS is released by hacker A0drul3z.\n\n2011\n\nhe hacker group Lulz Security is formed.\n\nApril 9: Bank of America website got hacked by a Turkish hacker named JeOPaRDY. An estimated 85,000 credit card numbers and accounts were reported to have been stolen due to the hack. Bank officials say no personal customer bank information is available on that web-page. Investigations are being conducted by the FBI to trace down the incriminated hacker.\n\nApril 17: An external intrusion sends the PlayStation Network offline, and compromises personally identifying information (possibly including credit card details) of its 77 million accounts, in what is claimed to be one of the five largest data breaches ever.\n\nComputer hacker sl1nk releases information of his penetration in the servers of the Department of Defense (DoD), Pentagon, NASA, NSA, US Military, Department of the Navy, Space and Naval Warfare System Command and other UK/US government websites.\n\nSeptember: Bangladeshi hacker TiGER-M@TE made a world record in defacement history by hacking 700,000 websites in a single shot.\n\nOctober 16: The YouTube channel of Sesame Street was hacked, streaming pornographic content for about 22 minutes.\n\nNovember 1: The main phone and Internet networks of the Palestinian territories sustained a hacker attack from multiple locations worldwide.\n\nNovember 7: The forums for Valve's Steam service were hacked. Redirects for a hacking website, Fkn0wned, appeared on the Steam users' forums, offering hacking tutorials and tools, porn, free giveaways and much more.\n\nDecember 14: Five members of the Norwegian hacker group, Noria, were arrested, allegedly suspected for hacking into the email account of the militant extremist Anders Behring Breivik (who perpetrated the 2011 attacks in the country).\n\n2012\n\nA hacker, Big-Smoke, published over 400,000 credit cards online,[78] and threatened Israel to release 1 million credit cards in the future. In response to that incident, an Israeli hacker published over 200 Albanian' credit cards online.\n\nGottfrid Svartholm Warg, the co-founder of Pirate Bay, was convicted in Denmark of hacking a mainframe computer, what was then Denmark's biggest hacking case.\n\nJanuary 7:Team Appunity, a group of Norwegian hackers, were arrested for breaking into Norway's largest prostitution website then publishing the user database online.\n\nFebruary 3: Marriott was hacked by a New Age ideologist, Attila Nemeth who was resisting against the New World Order where he said that corporations are allegedly controlling the world. As a response Marriott reported him to the United States Secret Service.\n\nFebruary 8: Foxconn is hacked by a hacker group, Swagg Security, releasing a massive amount of data including email and server logins, and even more alarming—bank account credentials of large companies like Apple and Microsoft. Swagg Security stages the attack just as a Foxconn protest ignites against terrible working conditions in southern China.\n\nMay 4: The websites of several Turkish representative offices of international IT-companies are defaced within the same day by F0RTYS3V3N (Turkish Hacker), including the websites of Google, Yandex, Microsoft, Gmail, MSN, Hotmail, PayPal.\n\nMay 24: WHMCS is hacked by UGNazi, they claim that the reason for this is because of the illegal sites that are using their software.\n\nMay 31: MyBB is hacked by newly founded hacker group, UGNazi, the website was defaced for about a day, they claim their reasoning for this was because they were upset that the forum board Hackforums.net uses their software.\n\nJune 5: The social networking website LinkedIn has been hacked and the passwords for nearly 6.5 million user accounts are stolen by cybercriminals. As a result, a United States grand jury indicted Nikulin and three unnamed co-conspirators on charges of aggravated identity theft and computer intrusion.\n\nAugust 15: The most valuable company in the world Saudi Aramco is crippled by a cyber warfare attack for months by malware called Shamoon. Considered the biggest hack in history in terms of cost and destructiveness . Carried out by an Iranian attacker group called Cutting Sword of Justice.[89] Iranian hackers retaliated against Stuxnet by releasing Shamoon. The malware destroyed over 35,000 Saudi Aramco computers, affecting business operations for months.\n\nDecember 17: Computer hacker sl1nk announced that he has hacked a total of 9 countries' SCADA systems. The proof includes 6 countries: France, Norway, Russia, Spain, Sweden and the United States.\n\n2013\n\nThe social networking website Tumblr is attacked by hackers. Consequently, 65,469,298 unique emails and passwords were leaked from Tumblr. The data breach's legitimacy is confirmed by computer security researcher Troy Hunt.\n\nAugust: Yahoo! data breaches occurred. More than 1 billion users data are being leaked.\n\n2014\n\nFebruary 7: The bitcoin exchange Mt. Gox filed for bankruptcy after $460 million was apparently stolen by hackers due to weaknesses in [their] system and another $27.4 million went missing from its bank accounts.\n\nOctober: The White House computer system was hacked.[93] It was said that the FBI, the Secret Service, and other U.S. intelligence agencies categorized the attacks among the most sophisticated attacks ever launched against U.S. government systems.\n\nNovember 24: In response to the release of the film The Interview, the servers of Sony Pictures are hacked by a hacker group calling itself Guardian of Peace.\n\nNovember 28: The website of the Philippine telecommunications company Globe Telecom was hacked in response to the poor internet service they are distributing.\n\n2015\n\nJune: the records of 21.5 million people, including social security numbers, dates of birth, addresses, fingerprints, and security clearance-related information, are stolen from the United States Office of Personnel Management (OPM).[96] Most of the victims are employees of the United States government and unsuccessful applicants to it. The Wall Street Journal and The Washington Post report that government sources believe the hacker is the government of China.\n\nJuly: The servers of extramarital affairs website Ashley Madison were breached.\n\n2016\n\nFebruary: The 2016 Bangladesh Bank heist attempted to steal US$951 million from a Bangladesh Bank, and succeeded in getting $101 million—although some of this was later recovered.\n\nMarch: VICE reported that a teenage hacker Cyber Anakin had gone on a hacking spree against Russian websites such as e-mail provider KM.RU and game company Nival to express his anger against Russia for the downing of the Malaysia Airlines Flight MH17 in eastern Ukraine. According to cybersecurity researcher Troy Hunt, at least 1.5 million victims were affected by the breaches. Many years later Latvia-based independent news website Meduza used the content of KM.RU's data breach to pinpoint the identity of a person who has been harassing female chess players of various countries such as Russia, Kazakhstan and India with the delivery of mails containing used condoms.\n\nJuly 22: WikiLeaks published the documents from the 2016 Democratic National Committee email leak.\n\nJuly 29: a group suspected coming from China launched hacker attacks on the website of Vietnam Airlines.\n\nAugust 13: The Shadow Brokers (TSB) started publishing several leaks containing hacking tools from the National Security Agency (NSA), including several zero-day exploits. Ongoing leaks until April 2017 (The Shadow Brokers)\n\nSeptember: Hacker Ardit Ferizi is sentenced to 20 years in prison after being arrested for hacking U.S. servers and passing the leaked information to members of ISIL terrorist group back in 2015.\n\nOctober: The 2016 Dyn cyberattack is being conducted with a botnet consisting of IOTs infected with Mirai by the hacktivist groups SpainSquad, Anonymous, and New World Hackers, reportedly in retaliation for Ecuador's rescinding Internet access to WikiLeaks founder Julian Assange at their embassy in London, where he has been granted asylum.\n\nLate 2016: Hackers steal international personal user data from the company Uber, including phone numbers, email addresses, and names, of 57 million people and 600,000 driver's license numbers of drivers for the company. Uber's GitHub account was accessed through Amazon's cloud-based service. Uber paid the hackers $100,000 for assurances the data was destroyed.\n\nDecember 2016: Yahoo! data breaches reported and affected more than 1 billion users. The data leakage includes user names, email addresses, telephone numbers, encrypted or unencrypted security questions and answers, dates of birth, and hashed passwords\n\n2017\n\nApril: A hacker group calling itself The Dark Overlord posted unreleased episodes of Orange Is the New Black TV series online after failing to extort the online entertainment company Netflix.\n\nMay: WannaCry ransomware attack started on Friday, May 12, 2017,[106] and has been described as unprecedented in scale, infecting more than 230,000 computers in over 150 countries.[107] A hacked unreleased Disney film is held for ransom, to be paid in Bitcoin.[citation needed]\n\nMay: 25,000 digital photos and ID scans relating to patients of the Grozio Chirurgija cosmetic surgery clinic in Lithuania were obtained and published without consent by an unknown group demanding ransoms.[108][109][110] Thousands of clients from more than 60 countries were affected.[108] The breach brought attention to weaknesses in Lithuania's information security.\n\nJune: 2017 Petya cyberattack.\n\nJune: TRITON (TRISIS), a malware framework designed to reprogram Triconex safety instrumented systems (SIS) of industrial control systems (ICS), discovered in Saudi Arabian Petrochemical plant.\n\nAugust: Hackers demand $7.5 million in Bitcoin to stop pre-releasing HBO shows and scripts, including Ballers, Room 104 and Game of Thrones.\n\nMay–July 2017: The Equifax breach.\n\nSeptember 2017: Deloitte breach.\n\nDecember: Mecklenburg County, North Carolina computer systems were hacked. They did not pay the ransom.\n\n2018\n\nMarch: Computer systems in the city of Atlanta, in the U.S. state of Georgia, are seized by hackers with ransomware. They did not pay the ransom,[117] and two Iranians were indicted by the FBI on cyber crime charges for the breach.\n\nThe town of Wasaga Beach in Ontario, Canada computer systems are seized by hackers with ransomware.\n\nSeptember: Facebook was hacked, exposing to hackers the personal information of an estimated 30 million Facebook users (initially estimated at 50 million) when the hackers stole the access tokens of 400,000 Facebook users. The information accessible to the hackers included users' email addresses, phone numbers, their lists of friends, Groups they are members of, users' search information, posts on their timelines, and names of recent Messenger conversations.\n\nOctober: West Haven, Connecticut USA computer systems are seized by hackers with ransomware, they paid $2,000 in ransom.[122]November\n\nThe first U.S. indictment of individual people for ransomware attacks occurs. The U.S. Justice Department indicted two men Faramarz Shahi Savandi and Mohammad Mehdi Shah Mansouri who allegedly used the SamSam ransomware for extortion, netting them more than $6 million in ransom payments. The companies infected with the ransomware included Allscripts, Medstar Health, and Hollywood Presbyterian Medical Center. Altogether, the attacks caused victims to lose more than $30 million, in addition to the ransom payments.\n\nMarriott disclosed that its Starwood Hotel brand had been subject to a security breach.\n\n2019\n\nMarch: Jackson County computer systems in the U.S. state of Georgia are seized by hackers with ransomware, they paid $400,000 in ransom.[124] The city of Albany in the U.S. state of New York experiences a ransomware cyber attack.\n\nApril: Computer systems in the city of Augusta, in the U.S. state of Maine, are seized by hackers using ransomware.[127][128] The City of Greenville (North Carolina)'s computer systems are seized by hackers using ransomware known as RobbinHood.[129][130] Imperial County, in the U.S. state of California, computer systems are seized by hackers using Ryuk ransomware.\n\nMay: computer systems belonging to the City of Baltimore are seized by hackers using ransomware known as RobbinHood that encrypts files with a file-locking virus, as well as the tool EternalBlue.\n\nJune: The city of Riviera Beach, Florida paid roughly $600,000 ransom in Bitcoin to hackers who seized their computers using ransomware.[136] Hackers stole 18 hours of unreleased music from the band Radiohead demanding $150,000 ransom. Radiohead released the music to the public anyway and did not pay the ransom.\n\nNovember: The Anonymous hacktivist collective announced that they have hacked into four Chinese computer databases and donated those to data breach indexing/notification service vigilante.pw. The hack was conducted in order to support the 2019 Hong Kong protests, amidst the Hong Kong police's siege of the city's Polytechnic University. They also brought up a possible peace plan first proposed by a professor at Inha University in hopes of having the Korean reunification and the five key demands of the Hong Kong protest being fulfilled at once.\n\n2020s\n\nvte\n\nHacking in the 2020s\n\n2020\n\nFebruary: Anonymous hacked the United Nations website and created a page for Taiwan, a country which had not had a seat at the UN since 1971. The hacked page featured the Flag of Taiwan, the KMT emblem, a Taiwan Independence flag, the Anonymous logo, embedded YouTube videos such as the Taiwanese national anthem and the closing score for the 2019 film Avengers: Endgame titled It's Been a Long, Long Time, and a caption. The hacked server belonged to the United Nations Department of Economic and Social Affairs.\n\nMay: Anonymous declared a large hack on May 28, three days after the murder of George Floyd. An individual claiming to represent Anonymous stated that We are Legion. We do not forgive. We do not forget. Expect us. in a now-deleted video. Anonymous addressed police brutality and said they will be exposing [their] many crimes to the world. It was suspected that Anonymous were the cause for the downtime and public suspension of the Minneapolis Police Department website and its parent site, the website of the City of Minneapolis.\n\nMay: Indian national Shubham Upadhyay posed as Superintendent of Police and, using social engineering, used a free caller identification app to call up the in-charge of the Kotwali police station, K. K. Gupta, in order to threaten him to get his phone repaired amidst the COVID-19 lockdown. The attempt was foiled.\n\nJune: Anonymous claimed responsibility for stealing and leaking a trove of documents collectively nicknamed 'BlueLeaks'. The 269-gigabyte collection was published by a leak-focused activist group known as Distributed Denial of Secrets. Furthermore, the collective took down Atlanta Police Department's website via DDoS, and defaced websites such as a Filipino governmental webpage and that of Brookhaven National Labs. They expressed support for Julian Assange and press freedom, while briefly taking a swing against Facebook, Reddit and Wikipedia for having 'engaged in shady practices behind our prying eyes'. In the case of Reddit, they posted a link to a court document describing the possible involvement of a moderator of a large traffic subreddit (/r/news) in an online harassment-related case.\n\nJune: The Buffalo, NY police department's website was supposedly hacked by Anonymous.[144] While the website was up and running after a few minutes, Anonymous tweeted again on Twitter urging that it be taken down.[145] A few minutes later, the Buffalo NY website was brought down again. They also hacked Chicago police radios to play N.W.A's Fuck tha Police.\n\nJune: Over 1,000 accounts on multiplayer online game Roblox were hacked to display that they supported U.S. President Donald Trump.\n\nJuly: The 2020 Twitter bitcoin scam occurred.\n\nJuly: User credentials of writing website Wattpad were stolen and leaked on a hacker forum. The database contained over 200 million records.\n\nAugust: A large number of subreddits were hacked to post materials endorsing Donald Trump. The affected subreddits included r/BlackPeopleTwitter, r/3amJokes, r/NFL, r/PhotoshopBattles. An entity with the name of calvin goh and Melvern had purportedly claimed responsibility for the massive defacement, and also made violent threats against a Chinese embassy.\n\nAugust: The US Air Force's Hack-A-Sat event was hosted at DEF CON's virtual conference where groups such as Poland Can Into Space, FluxRepeatRocket, AddVulcan, Samurai, Solar Wine, PFS, 15 Fitty Tree, and 1064CBread competed in order to control a satellite in space. The Poland Can Into Space team stood out for having successfully manipulated a satellite to take a picture of the Moon.\n\nAugust: The website of Belarusian company BrestTorgTeknika was defaced by a hacker nicknaming herself Queen Elsa, in order to support the 2020–21 Belarusian protests. In it, the page hacker exclaimed Get Iced Iced already and Free Belarus, revolution of our times with the latter alluding to the famous slogan used by 2019 Hong Kong protests. The results of the hack were then announced on Reddit's /r/Belarus subreddit by a poster under the username Socookre.\n\nAugust: Multiple DDoS attacks forced New Zealand's stock market to temporarily shut down.\n\nSeptember: The first suspected death from a cyberattack was reported after cybercriminals hit a hospital in Düsseldorf, Germany with ransomware.\n\nOctober: A wave of botnet-coordinated ransomware attacks against hospital infrastructure occurred in the United States, identified as associated with Russia [ru].[156] State security officials and American corporate security officers were concerned that these attacks might be a prelude to hacking of election infrastructure during the elections of the subsequent month, like similar incidents during the 2016 United States elections and other attacks;[157] there was, however, no evidence that they performed attacks on election infrastructure in 2020.\n\nDecember: A supply chain attack targeting upstream dependencies from Texas IT service provider SolarWinds results in serious, wide-ranging security breaches at the U.S. Treasury and Commerce departments. White House officials did not immediately publicly identify a culprit; Reuters, citing sources familiar with the investigation, pointed toward the Russian government.[159] An official statement shared by Senate Finance Committee ranking member, Ron Wyden said: Hackers broke into systems in the Departmental Offices division of Treasury, home to the department’s highest-ranking officials.\n\nDecember: A bomb threat posted from a Twitter account that was seemingly hacked by persons with the aliases of Omnipotent and choonkeat, against the Aeroflot Flight 102, a passenger flight with the plane tail number of VQ-BIL coming from Moscow to New York City. Due to that, a runway of New York's John F. Kennedy International Airport was temporarily closed and resulted in the delay of Aeroflot Flight 103, a return flight back to Moscow.\n\nDecember: The Anonymous group initiated 'Christmas gift' defacements against multiple Russian portals including a municipal website in Tomsk and that of a regional football club. Inside the defacements, they made multiple references such as Russian opposition activist Alexei Navalny, freedom protests in Thailand and Belarus, and opposition to the Chinese Communist Party. They also held a mock award based on an event on the game platform Roblox that was called RB Battles where YouTubers Tanqr and KreekCraft, the winner and the runner up of the actual game event, were compared to both Taiwan and New Zealand respectively due to the latter's reportedly stellar performance in fighting the COVID-19 pandemic.\n\n2021\n\nJanuary: Microsoft Exchange Server data breach\n\nFebruary: Anonymous announced cyber-attacks of at least five Malaysian websites. As a result, eleven individuals were nabbed as suspects.\n\nFebruary: Hackers including those with names of 张卫能 utoyo and full_discl0sure hijacked an events website Aucklife in order to craft a phony bomb threat against the Chinese consulate in Auckland, New Zealand, and also a similar facility in Sydney, Australia. Their motive was a punitive response against China due to COVID-19. As a result, a physical search was conducted at the consulate by New Zealand's Police Specialist Search Group while Aucklife owner Hailey Newton had since regained her access to the website. Wellington-based cybersecurity consultant Adam Boileau remarked that the hack isn't 'highly technical'.\n\nFebruary: The group Myanmar Hackers attacked several websites belonging to Myanmar government agencies such as the Central Bank of Myanmar and the military-run Tatmadaw True News Information Team. The group also targeted the Directorate of Investment and Company Administration, Trade Department, Customs Department, Ministry of Commerce, Myawady TV and state-owned broadcaster Myanmar Radio and Television and some private media outlets. A computer technician in Yangon found that the hacks were denial-of-service attacks, while the group's motive is to protest the 2021 Myanmar coup.\n\nApril: Over 500 million Facebook users' personal info—including info on 32 million in the United States—was discovered posted on a hackers' website, though Facebook claimed that the information was from a 2019 hack, and that the company had already taken mitigation measures; however, the company declined to say whether it had notified the affected users of the breach.[172][173][174][better source needed]\n\nApril: The Ivanti Pulse Connect Secure data breach of unauthorized access to the networks of high-value targets since at least June 2020 via CVE-2021-22893 across the U.S. and some E.U. nations[additional citation(s) needed] due to their use of vulnerable, proprietary software was reported.\n\nMay: Operation of the U.S. Colonial Pipeline is interrupted by a ransomware cyber operation.\n\nMay: On 21 May 2021 Air India was subjected to a cyberattack wherein the personal details of about 4.5 million customers around the world were compromised including passport, credit card details, birth dates, name and ticket information.\n\nJuly: On 22 July 2021 Saudi Aramco data were leaked by a third-party contractor and demanded $50 million ransom from Saudi Aramco. Saudi Aramco confirmed the incident after a hacker claimed on dark web that he had stolen 1 terabyte of data about location of oil refineries and employees data in a post that was posted on June 23.\n\nAugust: T-Mobile reported that data files with information from about 40 million former or prospective T-Mobile customers, including first and last names, date of birth, SSN, and driver's license/ID information, were compromised.\n\nSeptember and October: 2021 Epik data breach. Anonymous obtained and released over 400 gigabytes of data from the domain registrar and web hosting company Epik. The data was shared in three releases between September 13 and October 4. The first release included domain purchase and transfer details, account credentials and logins, payment history, employee emails, and unidentified private keys.[184] The hackers claimed they had obtained a decade's worth of data, including all customer data and records for all domains ever hosted or registered through the company, and which included poorly encrypted passwords and other sensitive data stored in plaintext.[184][185] The second release consisted of bootable disk images and API keys for third-party services used by Epik;[186] the third contained additional disk images and an archive of data belonging to the Republican Party of Texas, who are an Epik customer.\n\nOctober: On October 6, 2021, an anonymous 4chan reportedly hacked and leaked the source code of Twitch, as well as information on how much the streaming service paid almost 2.4 million streamers since August 2019.[188] Source code from almost 6,000 GitHub repositories was leaked, and the 4chan user said it was part one of a much larger release.\n\nNovember and December: On November 24th, Chen Zhaojun of Alibaba's Cloud Security Team reported a zero-day vulnerability (later dubbed Log4Shell) involving the use of arbitrary code execution in the ubiquitous Java logging framework software Log4j.[190][191][192] The report was privately disclosed to project developers of Log4j, a team at The Apache Software Foundation, on November 24. On December 8, Zhaojun contacted the developers again detailing how the vulnerability was being discussed in public security chat rooms, was already known by some security researchers, and pleaded that the team expedite the solution to the vulnerability in the official release version of Log4j.[192] Early exploitations were noticed on Minecraft servers on December 9; however, forensic analysis indicates that Log4Shell may have been exploited as early as December 1 or 2nd. Due to the ubiquity of devices with the Log4j software (hundreds of millions) and the simplicity in executing the vulnerability, it is considered to be arguably one of the largest and most critical vulnerabilities ever.[196][197] Yet, big names in security hacking helped in regaining control over server, like Graham Ivan Clark, and Elhamy A. Elsebaey. A portion of the vulnerability was fixed in a patch distributed on December 6, three days before the vulnerability was publicly disclosed on December 9.[192][194][198][199]2022\n\nFebruary: The German Chaos Computer Club has reported more than fifty data leaks. Government institutions and companies from various business sectors were affected. In total, the researchers had access to over 6.4 million personal data records as well as terabytes of log data and source code.\n\nMarch: The website of a local newspaper in Sumy, Ukraine was hacked by a person identifying themselves as zehang陈. They claimed that they and other individuals P_srim_asap, Mrthanthomthebomber, mister-handsomekai and RiansJohnson had placed bombs at Chinese and Russian diplomatic facilities in Malaysia with the former containing a photo of Huanan Seafood Wholesale Market, Hong Kong's International Finance Centre and MTR Airport Station, and the headquarters office of American game company ROBLOX. Besides that, they claimed responsibility for the delivery of an envelope containing white powders against the Russian embassy in Canberra, Australia. As a result the area surrounding the embassy was briefly cordoned off.\n\nMarch: As a response against 2022 Russian invasion of Ukraine, Anonymous attacked many computer systems in Russia. Most notably, Anonymous committed the 2022 Roskomnadzor leak.\n\nApril: According to Taiwan News, on Cosmonautics Day (April 12) Anonymous defaced five Russian websites, specifically the Russian heavy metal band Aria's site, a Russian hockey site, a Panerai watch enthusiasts site, a basketball team site, and an educational organization site. Furthermore, Taiwan News revealed that Cyber Anakin, a hacktivist within the decentralized collective, had contracted COVID-19 and hacked Chinese computer systems such as government websites, agricultural management systems, coal mine safety interfaces, nuclear power plant interfaces, and satellite interfaces, for five days as acts of retaliation.\n\nApril: Anonymous hacked Russian companies Aerogas, Forest, and Petrovsky Fort. From there they leaked around 437,500 emails which they donated to non-profit whistleblower organization Distributed Denial of Secrets. Furthermore, they leaked 446 GB of data from Russian Ministry of Cultur\n\n";         
          break;
           
           default: 
           cout<<"default input,chief!";
             }
        
            
    
}
}; 

int main()
{
    int i,password;
    char n;
    string s;
    string e;
   // string phrase="hello world";
  
    string ans;
    cout<< "password chief: ";
    
    cin>> s;

    
    
    if(s=="car"){
        a:
        
        cout<<"\nHEY BUDDY!\n\n";
       cout<< "\nwhat shall i do for you now.\n\n";
        f:
        
        cout<< "MOVIES \t\t GPS \t\t GAMES \t\t SONGS \n\n";
        
        //cout<< "\n\n***special operations[sp]***\n\n";
         cin>> ans;
        if(ans=="sp"){
        cout<< "hey chief,your secret commando here!\n\n";
        m:
        cout<<"You have entered the most confidential space in country's information storage system ! \n\nWhat can I do for you now?\n\n";
        cout<< "#disp.hijackers info[h]\t\t#disp.hackers info[k]\n\n#contact indian military officials[m]\t#contact indian navy[n]\n\n#contact indian airforce[a]\t\t#contact ind. army[c]\n\n#contact indian politicians[p]\t#contact indian journalists[j]\n\n";
        
        cin>> n;
        
      switch(n){
      
      case 'h' :
             warmachine w1;
             w1.hijackersinfo();
      
      break;
      
      case 'k'   :
              warmachine w2;
             w2.hackersinfo();
      
      break;
      
      case 'm'   :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations.  \n\n";
      break;
      
      case 'n'   :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations. \n\n";
      break;
      
      case 'a'   :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations. \n\n";
      break;
      
      case 'c'   :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations.  \n\n";
      break;
      
      case 'p'   :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations. \n\n";
      break;
      
      case 'j'   :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations. \n\n";
      break;
      
      case 9     :cout<< "processing chief.. it may take some time..untill then you can check with other informations.\n\n";
      break;
      
      default  :cout<< "err..i think you pressed wrong command button chief! \n\n";
      break;
  }
    
  goto m;
            
        }else{
       cout<< "terminated....tata!";
  }
    }else{
        cout<<"wrong password chief!\n";
    
    
    cout<<"\nrelax. Only 3 chances remaining.\n";
    cout<< "forgot password:\n";
    cout<< "\n";
   
    
    
    cout<< "enter R to reenter password or T to terminate further process.\n";
    
    cout<< "-------------------";
    cin>> e;
    
    if(e=="R"){
        
  for(i=0;i<3;i++){
      cout<< "enter password: \n";
      cin>>s;
      if(s=="car"){
          goto a;
      }else{
          
         switch(i+1){
             case 1:  cout<< "wrong password no."<<i+1<<" : bullet loading ..  \n";
             break;
             case 2:  cout<< "wrong password no."<<i+1<<" : bullet triggered ..  \n";
             break;
             case 3:  cout<< "wrong password no."<<i+1<<" : fire!!! \n";
             break;
         }
        
      }
  }
    }else{
        cout<< "\nterminated...mission off..";
    
    }
    }
    
  return 0;

}
//#indian hackers info\n\n##japneese hackers info\t\t#chineese hackers info\t\t#N.Korean hackers info\n\n
/* voice command

#include<iostream>
#include<string>
#include<windows.h>

using namespace std;

int main(){
    
    string phrase="hello world";
    string command ="espeak \""+phrase+"\"";
    const char* charcommand=command.c_str();
    system(charcommand);
}

*/

/* voice command

#include<iostream>
#include<string>
#include<windows.h>

using namespace std;

int main(){
    
    string phrase="hello world";
    string command ="espeak \""+phrase+"\"";
    const char* charcommand=command.c_str();
    system(charcommand);
}

*/
